Política de privacidade da
Sebby Games
Select Language
Afrikaans
Albanian
Amharic
Arabic
Armenian
Azerbaijani
Basque
Belarusian
Bengali
Bosnian
Bulgarian
Catalan
Cebuano
Chichewa
Chinese (Simplified)
Chinese (Traditional)
Corsican
Croatian
Czech
Danish
Dutch
English
Esperanto
Estonian
Filipino
Finnish
French
Frisian
Galician
Georgian
German
Greek
Gujarati
Haitian Creole
Hausa
Hawaiian
Hebrew
Hindi
Hmong
Hungarian
Icelandic
Igbo
Indonesian
Irish Gaelic
Italian
Japanese
Javanese
Kannada
Kazakh
Khmer
Korean
Kurdish (Kurmanji)
Kyrgyz
Lao
Latin
Latvian
Lithuanian
Luxembourgish
Macedonian
Malagasy
Malay
Malayalam
Maltese
Maori
Marathi
Mongolian
Myanmar (Burmese)
Nepali
Norwegian
Pashto
Persian
Polish
Punjabi (Gurmukhi)
Romanian
Russian
Samoan
Scots Gaelic
Serbian
Sesotho
Shona
Sindhi
Sinhala
Slovak
Slovenian
Somali
Spanish
Sundanese
Swahili
Swedish
Tajik
Tamil
Telugu
Thai
Turkish
Ukrainian
Urdu
Uzbek
Vietnamese
Welsh
Xhosa
Yiddish
Yoruba
Zulu
Powered by
Translate
1. INTRODUÇÃO
Você está lendo a política de privacidade da empresa Sebby Games. Esta política descreve como a empresa se comporta perante você usuário, no que diz respeito à divulgação e marketing, coleta, utilização, processamento e compartilhamento de informações sobre você.
A empresa Sebby Games tem o compromisso de proteger a sua privacidade e de todos os demais usuários que utilizam os nossos jogos.
Ao acessar e usar os jogos e aplicativos da empresa Sebby Games, você indica sua concordância com os termos desta Política.
O não fornecimento de determinados dados seus pode tornar limitada a sua experiência nos jogos da empresa Sebby Games. Se você não concordar com os termos desta Política de privacidade, por favor, não nos forneça nenhuma informação e não utilize os nossos Serviços.
Se você tem entre 13 e 17 anos, recomendamos que a leitura e a aceitação dessa política deverá ser realizada juntamente com seus pais ou com o seu responsável legal. Se você tem menos de 13 anos é obrigatório a presença dos Pais ou representantes legais na leitura da presente política de privacidade.
1.1 Entre em contato
Se você tiver dúvidas sobre proteção de dados ou se tiver alguma solicitação para resolver
problemas com seus dados pessoais, recomendamos que você entre em contato conosco para que possamos responder você o mais rapidamente.
Nome da empresa responsável: Sebby Games
Site: https://sebbygames.com.br/
email: studiosebbygames@gmail.com
Endereço Físico: Rua Coelho Neto 79 Tasso Fragoso MA 65820-000
2. INFORMAÇÕES COLETADAS PELA SEBBY GAMES
Quando você utiliza os aplicativos da Sebby Games e aceita a política de privacidade, você autoriza a empresa e os serviços contidos no jogo a coletar as seguintes informações de forma direta ou indireta:
2.1
A maioria das informações coletadas é você que nos envia diretamente, seja jogando ou
interagindo com a publicidade. De forma, grande parte das informações que coletamos
sobre você estão relacionadas ao tipo de dispositivo que você usa e à forma como joga
nossos jogos, podendo incluir informações enviadas ao criar uma conta conosco ou
informações cujo acesso tenha fornecido a nós ao conectar suas contas de redes sociais
com nossos jogos ou Serviços.
2.2
Não retemos nenhuma informação relacionada ao conteúdo das mensagens enviadas
no nosso bate-papo e sistemas de mensagens; Utilizamos ferramentas e serviços de
terceiros (Photon) para lhe oferecer uma ambiente de comunicação ainda mais dinâmico
e mais seguro, qualquer dúvida sobre o processamento de dados da empresa Photon,
você poderá acessar os termos da política de privacidade da empresa, o link da política
de privacidade se encontra no decorrer da nossa política de privacidade.
2.3
Ao registar no jogo podemos coletar informações relacionados ao seu nome, email, nome
de usuário (lembramos que qualquer senha utilizada nos nossos jogos trafega de forma
criptografada e não são armazenadas e nem utilizadas por essa empresa). Seu perfil de
usuário pode incluir informações pessoais e não pessoais, dependendo de como você
completa o perfil.
2.4
Para lhe entregar um serviço cada vez melhor, podemos processar dados como o email
da conta associada a seu aparelho móvel, o IP utilizado no momento de interação com
o jogo, e dados de identificação do aparelho, modelo, País, ID de publicidade, ,
localização geográfica, IMEI, e demais informações necessárias coletados durante o uso
do jogo. A Sebby Games poderá também coletar dados como conta, email, Nome e
idade, disponibilizados por ferramentas sociais, passíveis de serem utilizados pelo jogo,
sempre sob sua permissão.
3. O OBJETIVO DO PROCESSAMENTO DE DADOS
O objetivo da coleta e utilização dos dados é a entrega de um serviço cada vez mais completo e melhor para a sua experiência. Utilizamos os dados para operar os serviços do jogo, verificar e confirmar pagamentos, fornecer e entregar produtos solicitados, enviar comunicações relacionada aos serviços do jogo, dentre outras comodidades dentro do jogo.
Além disso, o processamento de dados tem como objetivo manter o jogo seguro e justo. Garantir condições equitativas no jogo é uma prioridade para nós. Para manter o Serviço e seus recursos sociais seguros e justos, combater a fraude e garantir um uso aceitável de outra forma, temos um interesse legítimo em processar os dados necessários para
1)
Analisar e monitorar o uso do Serviço e seus recursos sociais
2)
Bate-papo moderado, automático e/ou manualmente.
3)
Tomar medidas contra jogadores fraudulentos ou que se comportam mal
Além disso, focamos no melhoramento dos serviços de Publicidade, Análise, Serviços e
hospedagem de Plataforma, Desempenho de conteúdo e teste de recursos (teste A / B), Registro e autenticação, Infraestrutura monitoramento.
3.1 Detalhes e serviços utilizados no processamento de dados
3.1.1 Publicidade
O serviço de publicidade permite que os Dados do Usuário sejam utilizados para fins de comunicação de publicidade exibidos na forma de banners e outros anúncios neste aplicativo possivelmente com base nos interesses do Usuário.
Para fins de publicidade, os jogos da empresa Sebby Games utiliza apenas o serviços Admob
(Google LLC), publicidade fornecido pelo Google LLC. Para entender o uso de dados pelo Google, consulte a
política de parceiros do Google
.
Local de processamento: Estados Unidos
3.1.2 Teste de desempenho e recursos de conteúdo (teste A / B)
Os serviços contidos nesta seção permitem que o proprietário rastreie e análise a resposta do
jogador em relação ao tráfego ou comportamento em relação a alterações na estrutura, texto ou qualquer outro componente deste Aplicativo. Todos os dados coletados nessa sessão estão seguros pela política de privacidade da Google, que pode ser acessada pelo seguinte site
“
https://policies.google.com/privacy
”.
Local de processamento: Estados Unidos
3.1.3 Serviço de plataforma e hospedagem
Esses serviços têm o objetivo de hospedar e executar os principais componentes dos jogos da empresa Sebby Games, permitindo, portanto, o fornecimento deste Aplicativo a partir de uma plataforma unificada. Essas plataformas fornecem uma ampla gama de ferramentas ao Proprietário – por exemplo, análises, registro de usuários, comentários, gerenciamento de banco de dados, comércio eletrônico, processamento de pagamentos – que implicam na coleta e no manuseio de Dados Pessoais.
Alguns desses serviços funcionam através de servidores distribuídos geograficamente, dificultando a determinação da localização real onde os Dados Pessoais são armazenados.
Um dos serviços de plataformas utilizado é o da Google Play Store (Google LLC): Este jogo é distribuído na Google Play Store, uma plataforma para distribuição de aplicativos móveis, fornecida pelo Google LLC. Em virtude de ser distribuído por meio desta loja de aplicativos, o Google coleta dados de uso e diagnóstico e compartilha informações agregadas com o Proprietário. Muitas dessas informações são processadas de forma opcional. Os usuários podem desativar esse recurso de análise diretamente através das configurações do dispositivo. Mais informações sobre como gerenciar configurações de análise podem ser encontradas nesta página. Dados pessoais coletados: Dados de uso. Todos os dados coletados nessa sessão estão seguros pela política de privacidade da Google, que pode ser acessada pelo seguinte site “
https://policies.google.com/privacy
”. Local de processamento: Estados Unidos –
Outro serviço de plataforma utilizado é o APPLE STORE (APLE): Este jogo é distribuído na Apple Store, uma plataforma para distribuição de aplicativos móveis, fornecida pelo Apple. Em virtude de ser distribuído por meio desta loja de aplicativos, a Apple coleta dados de uso e diagnóstico e compartilha informações agregadas com o proprietário do jogo. Muitas dessas informações são processadas de forma opcional. Os usuários podem desativar esse recurso de análise diretamente através das configurações do dispositivo. Mais informações sobre como gerenciar configurações de análise podem ser encontradas nesta página. Dados pessoais coletados: Dados de uso. Todos os dados coletados nessa sessão estão seguros pela política de privacidade da Apple, que pode ser acessada pelo seguinte site “
https://www.apple.com/br/legal/privacy/br/
”. Local de processamento: Estados Unidos.
3.1.4 Google Analytics
Os serviços contidos nesta seção permitem ao Proprietário monitorar e analisar o tráfego da Web e podem ser usados para acompanhar o comportamento do Usuário.
Para fins de análise, utilizamos os serviços do grupo Unity (Unity Technologies ApS): O Unity Analytics é um serviço de análise fornecido pela Unity Technologies ApS.
Dados pessoais coletados: Dados de uso; vários tipos de dados, conforme especificado na política de privacidade do serviço que pode ser acessada no seguinte site:
https://unity3d.com/legal/privacypolicy
;
Local de processamento: Dinamarca
3.1.5 Registro e Autenticação
Todos os serviços relacionados ao registro e autenticação dos jogos da empresa Sebby Games são gerenciados por serviços de terceiros (por exemplo, a autenticação do usuário do jogo através do seu GMAIL pessoal vinculado aos serviços da Google). Dessa forma, a privacidade e a segurança dos dados estão devidamente detalhados nos termos das políticas de privacidade de acordo com o serviço utilizado pelo usuário.
Os links que direcionam para a política de privacidade dos serviços de terceiros utilizados pela empresa Sebby Games estão disponibilizados nessa política de privacidade. Todos os demais detalhes sobre como a empresa Sebby Games utiliza esses dados de terceiros também são
esclarecidos no texto da nossa política de privacidade. Local de processamento: Estados Unidos.
3.1.6 Servidor Online – Photon
Em seus jogos Online, a empresa Sebby Games utiliza os serviços e servidores da empresa Photon. Assim, todos os processamentos de dados e informações dos usuários são executados diretamente pela Photon Cloud (.Photon Unity Networking). Os servidores da Photon são responsáveis pelo serviço de hospedagem, operações e dimensionamento das informações. A empresa Sebby Games não retém nenhuma informação dos seus usuários enviadas no servidor online, toda as informações são processadas exclusivamente pelo Photon Cloud, frisamos, assim, que você usuário poderá acessar os termos de política de privacidade da empresa Photon para ter mais detalhes sobre o processamento de dados de seus servidores. Link
https://dashboard.photonengine.com/enUS/account/privacyandcookiepolicy
. Local de processamento: Estados Unidos.
4. DO LOCAL DO PROCESSAMENTO DOS DADOS E TEMPO DE RETENÇÃO
Os Dados são processados tanto no escritório da empresa Sebby Games quanto em qualquer outro local em que as partes envolvidas no processamento estejam localizadas.
Dependendo da localização do usuário do jogo, as transferências de dados podem envolver a transferência dos dados do usuário para um país diferente do seu. Para entender mais sobre o local de processamento desses Dados transferidos, os usuários podem verificar a seção que contém detalhes sobre o processamento de Dados Pessoais.
A empresa Sebby Games adota todas as medidas de segurança necessárias no momento da transferência dos dados dos usuários, garantindo a total privacidade e segurança dos dados dos seus usuários.
Os Usuários poderão descobrir mais detalhes verificando as seções deste documento ou em caso de dúvidas específicas, entrando em contato com a empresa Sebby Games.
4.1 Tempo de retenção
Em regra, as informações são processadas e armazenadas apenas pelo tempo necessário para atingir seus objetivos. Assim, os dados são retidos para manter e aprimorar os serviços essenciais do jogo.
Retemos a informação pelo período mais curto possível necessário para concluir a finalidade da coleta, com exceção dos casos que envolvam obrigações legais e ordem judicial.
Além disso, não nos responsabilizamos pelo tempo de retenção relacionado aos serviços de terceiros, para mais detalhes sobre o tempo de retenção dos serviços de terceiros, o usuário deverá ler suas respectivas políticas de privacidade.
Quando o período de retenção expirar, os dados retidos serão excluídos. Portanto, o direito de acesso, o direito de apagar, o direito à retificação e o direito à portabilidade de dados não podem ser aplicados após o término do período de retenção.
5. OS DIREITOS DOS USUÁRIOS
A empresa Sebby Games preza e garante o respeito aos direitos dos seus usuários.
Qualquer dúvida ou solicitação para exercer os direitos do Usuário pode ser direcionada à empresa Sebby Games através dos detalhes de contato fornecidos neste documento. Esses pedidos podem ser exercidos gratuitamente e serão analisados pela Sebby Games o mais rápido possível.
Dessa forma, em regra, os usuários têm os seguintes direitos garantidos:
Retire seu consentimento a qualquer momento. Os usuários têm o direito de retirar o consentimento, caso tenham previamente consentido com o processamento de seus Dados Pessoais.
Objeto ao processamento de seus dados. Os usuários têm o direito de se opor ao processamento de seus dados se o processamento for realizado em uma base legal que não seja o consentimento. Mais detalhes são fornecidos na seção dedicada abaixo.
Acesse seus dados. Os usuários têm o direito de saber se os Dados estão sendo processados pelo Proprietário, obter divulgação sobre certos aspectos do processamento e obter uma cópia dos Dados em processamento.
Verifique e busque retificação. Os usuários têm o direito de verificar a precisão de seus dados e solicitar que sejam atualizados ou corrigidos.
Restrinja o processamento de seus dados. Os usuários têm o direito, sob certas circunstâncias, de restringir o processamento de seus Dados. Nesse caso, o Proprietário não processará seus Dados para qualquer outra finalidade que não seja armazená-los.
Os dados pessoais serão excluídos ou removidos. Os usuários têm o direito, sob certas circunstâncias, de solicitar a exclusão ou remoção de suas informações.
Receba os dados e transfira-os para outro controlador. Os usuários têm o direito de receber seus Dados em um formato estruturado, comumente usado e legível por máquina e, se tecnicamente viável, transmiti-los para outro controlador sem nenhum impedimento. Esta disposição é aplicável desde que os Dados sejam processados por meios automatizados e que o processamento seja baseado no consentimento do Usuário, em um contrato do qual o Usuário faça parte ou em obrigações pré-contratuais. Além disso, para exercer esse direito, o usuário deverá enviar essas informações de forma direta para o ambiente virtual de controle da empresa Sebby Games, comprovando, assim, que os dados não foram retidos por serviços de terceiros.
Apresentar uma reclamação. Os usuários têm o direito de apresentar uma reclamação perante sua autoridade competente de proteção de dados.
5.1 Da proteção da privacidade das crianças
A empresa Sebby Games garante a proteção da privacidade das crianças. A política de privacidade da empresa respeita e encontra-se em conformidade com a Lei de Proteção à Privacidade Online para Crianças (COPPA, dos EUA) e lei 13.709/2018 (lei de proteção de dados do Brasil).
Dessa forma, a política de privacidade das crianças da empresa Sebby Games, rege pelas seguintes regras e princípios:
Informamos, através de uma linguagem simples e direta, que tipo de informações coletamos e para qual finalidade ela é utilizada.
Para as crianças com idade menor que 13 (treze) anos, é obrigatoriamente necessário o consentimento dos seus Pais ou Responsáveis legais para aceitar a presente política de privacidade da empresa Sebby Games e os termos aqui contidos.
A empresa Sebby Games fica a disposição para esclarecer aos Pais e Responsáveis legais, através de requerimentos ou solicitações, qualquer dúvida sobre o tipo de informação e finalidade da coleta de dados dos seus usuários.
Adotamos todos os procedimentos legais de segurança para garantir a confidencialidade e integridade dos dados recolhidos das crianças.
5.2 Bate papo Online e filtro de palavras inapropriadas:
Em seus jogos online, a empresa Sebby Games disponibiliza para você o nosso bate papo online. O nosso bate papo tem como objetivo a aproximação e comunicação dos jogadores em prol de um ambiente mais interativo e imersivo.
Porém, nossa política de privacidade é rígida sobre os termos e palavras que podem ser digitadas em nosso bate papo, por isso, solicitamos que você usuário respeite e se atente às regras de condutas contidas na nossa política de privacidade, para que assim possamos manter uma ambiente virtual saudável para todos.
Dessa forma, dispomos da tecnologia dos servidores Photon para controlarmos os diálogos no nosso Bate Papo. Utilizamos a ferramenta de filtro de palavras inapropriadas (Community Sift), para evitar e censurar qualquer tipo de tentativa de bullying, sexting, comportamento tóxico, fraudes ou qualquer outro comportamento que consideramos ofensivo.
Prezamos em manter um ambiente virtual seguro onde os Usuários de todas as idades podem ter como único objetivo a diversão em nossos jogos.
5.3 Das orientações aos Pais e Responsáveis Legais:
Orientamos também que os Pais e responsáveis pelas crianças tomem as seguintes lista de
verificação de segurança:
5.3.1 Tenha uma conversa com seu filho sobre jogos
Fale sobre os hábitos de jogo do seu filho. Incentive-os a falar com você sobre qualquer coisa que os perturbe.
5.3.2 Conheça o jogo e suas opções de relatório
Recomendamos mostrar interesse e até jogar o jogo com seu filho em intervalos regulares. Dica útil: consulte os tutoriais do jogo e os guias do jogo juntos para garantir que vocês entendam como o jogo funciona. Em particular, você e seu filho devem saber como usar a ferramenta silenciar e relatar.
5.3.3 Verifique o nome do usuário do seu filho
Verifique se o apelido do seu filho no jogo não é o nome real. Você também pode verificar se o apelido deles é inapropriado.
5.3.4 Verifique as configurações de compra no aplicativo
Familiarize-se com as maneiras de restringir ou desativar as compras no aplicativo no dispositivo do seu filho.
5.3.5 Conversa com seu filho sobre os riscos de compartilhar
informação online
Discuta cuidadosamente os perigos de conversar com estranhos on-line. Eles devem desenvolver um ceticismo saudável de com quem estão falando e sobre o que. As principais coisas que eles NÃO devem compartilhar incluem: sexo, idade, localização, etnia, religião, sexualidade, altura, hobbies
5.3.6 Relatório / obtenha ajuda
Se tudo der errado e seu filho enfrentar problemas no jogo, relate-o para que possamos ajudá-lo. Todas as demais disposições relacionadas à manutenção de um ambiente saudável e seguro, especialmente para as crianças, podem ser verificados nos na sessão termos de serviços e condutas da empresa Sebby Games.
6. TERMOS DE SERVIÇOS E CONDUTA
Os termos deste contrato (“Termos de Serviço”) regem o relacionamento entre você e a Sebby Games.
O uso do Serviço também é regido pela Política de Privacidade da Sebby Games e outras políticas relevantes, que são incorporadas aqui por referência.
Antes de usar acessar o jogo da empresa Sebby Games, você deve concordar com estes Termos de Serviço e a Política de Privacidade.
Se você acessar o Serviço a partir de um Site de Rede Social (“SNS”), como o Google+, deverá cumprir seus termos de serviço / uso, bem como estes Termos de Serviço.
Ao instalar, usar ou acessar o serviço de outra forma, você concorda com estes termos de serviço. Se você não concordar com estes termos de serviço, não instale, utilize ou acesse o serviço. O uso do serviço é anulado onde é proibido.
A Sebby Games reserva o direito de, a seu critério, alterar, modificar, adicionar ou remover partes destes Termos de Serviço, sua Política de Privacidade e outras políticas relevantes da Sebby Games a qualquer momento, publicando os termos alterados no Serviço da Sebby Games. Considera-se que você aceitou tais alterações, continuando a usar o Serviço. Se, a qualquer momento, você não concordar com qualquer parte da versão atual dos nossos Termos de Serviço, da Política de Privacidade da Sebby Games ou de qualquer outra política, regras ou códigos de conduta da Sebby Games relacionados ao uso do Serviço, sua licença para O uso do Serviço será encerrado imediatamente e você deverá parar imediatamente de usá-lo.
6.1 Das regras de conduta
A Sebby Games prioriza um ambiente virtual onde há a manutenção do respeito e diversão entre os seus usuários.
A empresa Sebby Games não tolera qualquer tipo de ato criminoso, racista ou congênere que desvirtue os princípios da empresa e viole os direitos dos seus usuários. Dessa forma, a Sebby Games conduz seus jogos com a exigência ao respeito às seguintes regras:
6.1.1
Em nosso ambiente virtual, não toleramos qualquer tipo de ato, mensagem ou atitude abusiva, ameaçadora, obscena, difamatória, difamatória ou racial, sexual, religiosa ou de outra forma censurável ou ofensiva ou se envolva em um comportamento tóxico contínuo, como postar repetidamente informações de forma não solicitada.
6.1.2
Não toleramos qualquer tipo de informação que contenha nudez, violência excessiva ou assunto ofensivo ou que contenha um link para esse conteúdo.
6.1.3
Não toleramos qualquer tipo de tentativa ou assédio, abuso ou dano, bullying, promover ou incitar assédio, abuso ou dano à outra pessoa, grupo, incluindo à empresa Sebby Games.
6.1.4
Não toleramos qualquer tipo de compartilhamento ou disponibilização dentro do nosso jogo de material ou informação que infrinja direitos autorais, marca comercial, patente, segredo comercial, direito de privacidade, direito de publicidade ou outro direito de qualquer pessoa ou entidade ou personifique qualquer outra pessoa
6.1.5
Não permitimos qualquer tipo de engenharia reversa, descompilação, desmonte, decifre ou tente derivar o código fonte de qualquer software subjacente ou outra propriedade intelectual usada para fornecer o Serviço ou qualquer jogo da Sebby Games, ou obter qualquer informação do Serviço ou qualquer jogo da Sebby Games usando qualquer método não expressamente permitido pela Sebby
Games.
6.1.6
Não toleramos qualquer tentativa de solicitação de Informações de Login ou quaisquer outras credenciais de login ou informações pessoais de outros usuários do Serviço ou de qualquer jogo da Sebby Games.
6.1.7
Proibimos qualquer tipo de ato relacionado a coleta ou publicação de informações pessoais de qualquer pessoa, incluindo informações de identificação pessoal (seja em texto, imagem ou vídeo), documentos de identificação ou informações financeiras através do Serviço.
6.2 Das compras
Dentro do jogo você poderá realizar compra de itens limitados, pessoais, intransferíveis e exclusivos.
A Sebby Games pode gerenciar, regular, controlar, modificar ou eliminar Itens Virtuais e/ou Mercadorias a qualquer momento, com ou sem aviso prévio.
A Sebby Games não processa pagamentos para compras no aplicativo ou tem acesso às informações do cartão de crédito. As transações de pagamento são processadas na App Store ou no Google Play (dependendo do seu dispositivo) por meio do endereço de e-mail pessoal associado a essa conta. Os recibos de transação são enviados a você pela Apple ou pelo Google após cada compra. Às vezes, as compras podem ser agrupadas se você comprou vários itens e pode levar alguns dias para você receber o recibo. Esses processos pós-compra estão sujeitos a alterações pela Apple ou pelo Google. A Sebby Games não oferece nenhum programa de cobrança.
Sobre os seus dados bancários, não processamos pagamentos por compras no aplicativo nem temos acesso a nenhuma das suas informações de pagamento. Isso ocorre porque as próprias transações de pagamento são concluídas na App Store da Apple ou no Google Play (dependendo do seu dispositivo) por meio do seu endereço de e-mail pessoal associado a essa conta. Os recibos dessas transações são enviados a você pela Apple ou pelo Google por e-mail após cada compra (embora observe que quaisquer processos pós-compra são controlados pela Apple ou pelo Google e estão sujeitos a alterações por eles).
6.3 Do Reembolso
Como na maioria dos produtos de software para download, a regra é que os itens comprados em nossos jogos (compras no aplicativo) são realizados através de serviços finais e não são reembolsáveis. Em casos raros, exceções podem ser aplicadas.
6.3.1
Se a compra foi feita em um dispositivo Apple (iOS):
6.3.1.1
Para compras feitas em um dispositivo iOS, a Sebby Games analisará, de acordo com o caso concreto, sobre a possibilidade de reembolso, para tanto, envie um email para
studiosebbygames@gmail.com
. Da mesma forma, visite o suporte da Apple e selecione o link “Entre em contato com o suporte da loja iTunes”, depois “Compras, cobrança e resgate” e escolha a opção
que melhor se adequa a você.
Se a compra foi feita em um dispositivo do Google (Android):
6.3.1.2
Envie um e-mail para
studiosebbygames@gmail.com
. Na sua mensagem, indique o nome do jogo em que a compra foi realizada e adicione o recibo da compra. O ID da transação (semelhante a este – GPA.1234-1234-1234-12345) na parte inferior do documento deve estar visível. Os recibos das transações foram enviados a você pelo Google após cada compra.
6.4 Demais disposições
A Sebby Games pode gerenciar, regular, controlar, modificar ou eliminar Itens Virtuais e / ou Mercadorias a qualquer momento, com ou sem aviso prévio. A Sebby Games não se responsabiliza por você ou por terceiros no caso em que a Sebby Games exerça esses direitos.
Você concorda em pagar todas as taxas e impostos aplicáveis incorridos por você ou qualquer pessoa que utilize uma Conta registrada para você. Você reconhece que a Sebby Games não tem condições técnicas e financeiras para reembolsar todo e qualquer devolução de compras efetuadas dentro do jogo.
A transferência de itens e mercadorias virtuais é proibida, exceto onde expressamente autorizado no jogo. Além do expressamente autorizado no jogo, você não deve vender, comprar, resgatar ou transferir Itens Virtuais ou Mercadoria para qualquer pessoa ou entidade ou tentar qualquer um dos itens acima mencionados.
7. DEMAIS INFORMAÇÕES
Caso haja solicitação de preenchimento de formulários, pesquisas e levantamentos, podemos solicitar que você nos forneça “informações pessoais”, como seu nome completo, nome de usuário, e-mail, endereço residencial e/ou número telefônico residencial ou comercial. Você sempre saberá quando coletamos suas informações pessoais, pois fazemos isso apenas quando você, voluntariamente, nos envia por meio de nossos formulários online em nossos ambientes virtuais
seguros.
Mais detalhes sobre a coleta ou processamento de dados pessoais podem ser solicitados ao controlador de dados, a qualquer momento. Favor ver as informações de contato no início deste documento.
7.1 Ação legal
Os Dados Pessoais do Usuário podem ser utilizados para fins legais pela empresa Sebby Games na justiça ou em caos de possíveis ações legais decorrentes do uso inadequado deste Aplicativo ou dos Serviços relacionados. O Usuário declara estar ciente de que o Proprietário pode ser obrigado a revelar dados pessoais mediante requerimento das autoridades públicas.
7.2 Informações adicionais sobre os dados pessoais do usuário
Além das informações contidas nesta política de privacidade, este jogo pode fornecer ao Usuário informações adicionais e contextuais relativas a determinados serviços ou à coleta e processamento de Dados Pessoais, mediante solicitação.
7.3 Logs e manutenção do sistema
Para fins de operação e manutenção, este Aplicativo e quaisquer serviços de terceiros podem coletar arquivos que registram a interação com este Aplicativo (logs do sistema) usam outros Dados Pessoais (como o Endereço IP) para esse fim.
7.4 Informações não contidas nesta política
Mais detalhes sobre a coleta ou processamento de Dados Pessoais podem ser solicitados à empresa Sebby Games a qualquer momento.
7.5 Como as solicitações “Não rastrear” são tratadas
Este aplicativo não suporta solicitações “Não rastrear”.
Para determinar se algum dos serviços de terceiros que ele usa atende às solicitações de “Não rastrear”, leia suas políticas de privacidade.
7.6 Cookies
Cookies são arquivos com uma pequena quantidade de dados que são comumente usados como identificadores exclusivos anônimos. Eles são enviados para o navegador a partir dos sites visitados e armazenados na memória interna do dispositivo.
Este serviço não usa esses “cookies” explicitamente. No entanto, o aplicativo pode usar código e bibliotecas de terceiros que usam “cookies” para coletar informações e melhorar seus serviços. Você tem a opção de aceitar ou recusar esses cookies e saber quando um cookie está sendo enviado para o seu dispositivo. Se você optar por recusar nossos cookies, poderá não conseguir usar algumas partes deste Serviço.
7.7 Da limitação de responsabilidade
Até o máximo permitido pela lei, a Sebby Games não será responsável por qualquer dano indireto, incidental, consequencial, especial, punitivo ou outros danos similares supostamente causados pelos serviços do jogo ou pelo jogo em si.
Nada nestes termos de serviço afetará os direitos estatutários de qualquer consumidor, excluir ou restringir qualquer responsabilidade resultante de grande negligência
Você concorda em indenizar, defender e eximir a Sebby Games de qualquer reivindicação, demanda, danos ou outras perdas, incluindo honorários advocatícios razoáveis, reivindicados por terceiros resultantes decorrente ou decorrente do uso do Serviço ou de qualquer violação por parte destes Termos de Serviço, no entanto, o disposto acima não se aplica se a violação de direitos não for atribuível ao seu comportamento intencional ou negligente.
7.8 Alterações nesta política de privacidade
A Sebby Games reserva o direito de fazer alterações nesta política de privacidade a qualquer momento, notificando seus Usuários nesta página e, possivelmente, dentro do jogo (dentro dos limites técnicos e legais) enviando um aviso aos Usuários. É altamente recomendável verificar esta página com frequência, referindo-se à data da última modificação listada na parte inferior.
Se as alterações afetarem as atividades de processamento realizadas com base no consentimento do Usuário, a Sebby Games deverá coletar novo consentimento do Usuário, quando necessário.
A Sebby Games agradece a sua confiança em nossos jogos!!!!
Translate »
Original text
Rate this translation
Your feedback will be used to help improve Google Translate
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://policies.google.com/privacy:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Privacy Policy
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
Data transfer frameworks
Key terms
Partners
Updates
Google Privacy Policy
When you use our services, you’re trusting us with your information. We understand this is a big responsibility and work hard to protect your information and put you in control.
This Privacy Policy is meant to help you understand what information we collect, why we collect it, and how you can update, manage, export, and delete your information.
If European Union or United Kingdom data protection law applies to the processing of your information, you can review the
European requirements section
below to learn more about your rights and Google’s compliance with these laws.
Privacy Checkup
Looking to change your privacy settings?
Take the Privacy Checkup
Effective September 16, 2024
|
Archived versions
|
Download PDF
Contents
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
We build a range of services that help millions of people daily to explore and interact with the world in new ways. Our services include:
Google apps, sites, and devices, like Search, YouTube, and Google Home
Platforms like the Chrome browser and Android operating system
Products that are integrated into third-party apps and sites, like ads, analytics, and embedded Google Maps
You can use our services in a variety of ways to manage your privacy. For example, you can sign up for a Google Account if you want to create and manage content like emails and photos, or see more relevant search results. And you can use many Google services when you’re signed out or without creating an account at all, like searching on Google or watching YouTube videos. You can also choose to browse the web in a private mode, like
Chrome Incognito
mode, which helps keep your browsing private from other people who use your device. And across our services, you can adjust your privacy settings to control whether we collect some types of data and how we use it.
To help explain things as clearly as possible, we’ve added examples, explanatory videos, and definitions for
key terms
. And if you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, you can
contact us
.
Information Google collects
We want you to understand the types of information we collect as you use our services
We collect information to provide better services to all our users — from figuring out basic stuff like which language you speak, to more complex things like which
ads you’ll find most useful
,
the people who matter most to you online
, or which YouTube videos you might like. The information Google collects, and how that information is used, depends on how you use our services and how you manage your privacy controls.
When you’re not signed in to a Google Account, we store the information we collect with
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or
device
you’re using. This allows us to do things like maintain your preferences across browsing sessions, such as your preferred language or whether to show you more relevant search results or ads based on your activity.
When you’re signed in, we also collect information that we store with your Google Account, which we treat as
personal information
.
Things you create or provide to us
When you create a Google Account, you provide us with
personal information
that includes your name and a password. You can also choose to add a
phone number
or
payment information
to your account. Even if you aren’t signed in to a Google Account, you might choose to provide us with information — like an email address to communicate with Google or receive updates about our services.
We also collect the content you create, upload, or receive from others when using our services.  This includes things like email you write and receive, photos and videos you save, docs and spreadsheets you create, and comments you make on YouTube videos.
Information we collect as you use our services
Your apps, browsers & devices
We collect information about the apps, browsers, and
devices
you use to access Google services, which helps us provide features like automatic product updates and dimming your screen if your battery runs low.
The information we collect includes
unique identifiers
, browser type and settings, device type and settings, operating system, mobile network information including carrier name and phone number, and application version number. We also collect information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, including
IP address
, crash reports, system activity, and the date, time, and
referrer URL
of your request.
We collect this information when a Google service on your device contacts our servers — for example, when you install an app from the Play Store or when a service checks for automatic updates. If you’re using an
Android device with Google apps
, your device periodically contacts Google servers to provide information about your device and connection to our services. This information includes things like your
device type and carrier name
, crash reports, which apps you've installed, and, depending on your device settings,
other information about how you’re using your Android device
.
Your activity
We collect information about your activity in our services, which we use to do things like recommend a YouTube video you might like. The activity information we collect may include:
Terms you search for
Videos you watch
Views and interactions with content and ads
Voice and audio information
Purchase activity
People with whom you communicate or share content
Activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Chrome browsing history you’ve
synced with your Google Account
If you use our
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
, we may collect call and message log information like your phone number, calling-party number, receiving-party number, forwarding numbers, sender and recipient email address, time and date of calls and messages, duration of calls, routing information, and types and volumes of calls and messages.
You can visit your Google Account to find and manage activity information that’s saved in your account.
Go to Google Account
Your location information
We collect location information when you use our services, which helps us offer features like driving directions, search results for things near you, and ads based on your location.
Depending on the products you’re using and settings you choose, Google may use different types of location information to help make some services and products you use more helpful. These include:
GPS and other
sensor data from your device
IP address
Activity on Google services
, such as from your searches or
places you label like home or work
Information about things near your device
, such as Wi-Fi access points, cell towers, and Bluetooth-enabled devices
The types of location data we collect and how long we store it depend in part on your device and account settings. For example, you can
turn your Android device’s location on or off
using the device’s settings app. You can also turn on
Location History
if you want to create a private map of where you go with your signed-in devices. And if your Web & App Activity setting is enabled, your searches and other activity from Google services, which may also include location information, is saved to your Google Account. Learn more about
how we use location information
.
In some circumstances, Google also collects information about you from
publicly accessible sources
. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. We may also collect information about you from trusted partners, such as directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, marketing partners who provide us with information about potential customers of our business services, and security partners who provide us with information to
protect against abuse
. We also receive information from partners to provide
advertising and research services on their behalf
.
We use various technologies to collect and store information, including
cookies
,
pixel tags
, local storage, such as
browser web storage
or
application data caches
, databases, and
server logs
.
Why Google collects data
We use data to build better services
We use the information we collect from all our services for the following purposes:
Provide our services
We use your information to
deliver our services
, like processing the terms you search for in order to return results or helping you share content by suggesting recipients from your contacts.
Maintain & improve our services
We also use your information to
ensure our services are working as intended
, such as tracking outages or troubleshooting issues that you report to us. And we use your information to
make improvements
to our services — for example, understanding which search terms are most frequently misspelled helps us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Develop new services
We use the information we collect in existing services to help us develop new ones. For example, understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Provide personalized services, including content and ads
We use the information we collect to customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and
customized search results
. For example,
Security Checkup
provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products. And, depending on your available settings, Google Play could use information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
Depending on your settings, we may also show you
personalized ads
based on your interests and activity across Google services. For example, if you search for “mountain bikes,” you may see ads for sports equipment on YouTube. You can control what information we use to show you ads by visiting your ad settings in
My Ad Center
.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on
sensitive categories
, such as race, religion, sexual orientation, or health.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on your content from Drive, Gmail, or Photos.
We don’t share information that personally identifies you with advertisers, such as your name or email, unless you ask us to. For example, if you see an ad for a nearby flower shop and select the “tap to call” button, we’ll connect your call and may share your phone number with the flower shop.
Go to My Ad Center
Measure performance
We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used. For example, we analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design. And we also use data about the ads you interact with, including your related Google Search activity, to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We use a variety of tools to do this, including Google Analytics. When you visit sites or use apps that use Google Analytics, a Google Analytics customer may choose to enable Google to
link information
about your activity from that site or app with activity from other sites or apps that use our ad services.
Communicate with you
We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly. For example, we may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location. Or we may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services. And if you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Protect Google, our users, and the public
We use information to help improve the
safety and reliability
of our services. This includes detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or
the public
.
We use different technologies to process your information for these purposes. We use automated systems that analyze your content to provide you with things like customized search results, personalized ads, or other features tailored to how you use our services. And we analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content. We also use
algorithms
to recognize patterns in data. For example, Google Translate helps people communicate across languages by detecting common language patterns in phrases you ask it to translate.
We may
use the information we collect
across our services and across your devices for the purposes described above. For example, depending on your available settings, if you watch videos of guitar players on YouTube, you might see an ad for guitar lessons on a site that uses our ad products. Depending on your account settings,
your activity on other sites and apps
may be associated with your personal information in order to improve Google’s services and the ads delivered by Google.
If other users already have your email address or other information that identifies you, we may show them your publicly visible Google Account information, such as your name and photo. This helps people identify an email coming from you, for example.
We’ll ask for your consent before using your information for a purpose that isn’t covered in this Privacy Policy.
Your privacy controls
You have choices regarding the information we collect and how it's used
This section describes key controls for managing your privacy across our services. You can also visit the
Privacy Checkup
, which provides an opportunity to review and adjust important privacy settings. In addition to these tools, we also offer specific privacy settings in our products — you can learn more in our
Product Privacy Guide
.
Go to Privacy Checkup
Managing, reviewing, and updating your information
When you’re signed in, you can always review and update information by visiting the services you use. For example, Photos and Drive are both designed to help you manage specific types of content you’ve saved with Google.
We also built a place for you to review and control information saved in your Google Account. Your
Google Account
includes:
Privacy controls
Activity Controls
Decide what types of activity you’d like saved in your account. For example, if you have YouTube History turned on, the videos you watch and the things you search for are saved in your account so you can get better recommendations and remember where you left off. And if you have Web & App Activity turned on, your searches and activity from other Google services are saved in your account so you can get more personalized experiences like faster searches and more helpful app and content recommendations. Web & App Activity also has a subsetting that lets you control whether
information about your activity on other sites, apps, and devices that use Google services
, such as apps you install and use on Android, is saved in your Google Account and used to improve Google services.
Go to Activity Controls
Ad settings
Manage your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that
partner with Google
to show ads. You can modify your interests, choose whether your personal information is used to make ads more relevant to you, and turn on or off certain advertising services.
Go to My Ad Center
About you
Manage personal info in your Google Account and control who can see it across Google services.
Go to About You
Shared endorsements
Choose whether your name and photo appear next to your activity, like reviews and recommendations, that appear in ads.
Go to Shared Endorsements
Sites and apps that use Google services
Manage information that websites and apps using Google services, like Google Analytics, may share with Google when you visit or interact with their services.
Go to How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Ways to review & update your information
My Activity
My Activity allows you to review and control data that’s saved to your Google Account when you’re signed in and using Google services, like searches you’ve done or your visits to Google Play. You can browse by date and by topic, and delete part or all of your activity.
Go to My Activity
Google Dashboard
Google Dashboard allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Go to Dashboard
Your personal information
Manage your contact information, such as your name, email, and phone number.
Go to Personal Info
When you’re signed out, you can manage information associated with your browser or device, including:
Signed-out search personalization:
Choose
whether your search activity is used to offer you more relevant results and recommendations.
YouTube settings: Pause and delete your
YouTube Search History
and your
YouTube Watch History
.
Ad Settings:
Manage
your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Exporting, removing & deleting your information
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Inactive Account Manager
allows you to give someone else access to parts of your Google Account in case you’re unexpectedly unable to use your account.
And finally, you can also
request to remove content
from specific Google services based on applicable law and our policies.
There are other ways to control the information Google collects whether or not you’re signed in to a Google Account, including:
Browser settings: For example, you can configure your browser to indicate when Google has set a
cookie
in your browser. You can also configure your browser to block all cookies from a specific domain or all domains. But remember that our services
rely on cookies to function properly
, for things like remembering your language preferences.
Device-level settings: Your device may have controls that determine what information we collect. For example, you can
modify location settings
on your Android device.
Sharing your information
When you share your information
Many of our services let you share information with other people, and you have control over how you share. For example, you can share videos on YouTube publicly or you can decide to keep your videos private. Remember, when you share information publicly, your content may become accessible through search engines, including Google Search.
When you’re signed in and interact with some Google services, like leaving comments on a YouTube video or reviewing an app in Play, your name and photo appear next to your activity. We may also display this information in
ads depending on your Shared endorsements setting
.
When Google shares your information
We do not share your personal information with companies, organizations, or individuals outside of Google except in the following cases:
With your consent
We’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent. For example, if you
use Google Home to make a reservation
through a booking service, we’ll get your permission before sharing your name or phone number with the restaurant. We also provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account. We’ll ask for your explicit consent to share any
sensitive personal information
.
With domain administrators
If you’re a student or work for an organization that uses Google services, your
domain administrator
and resellers who manage your account will have access to your Google Account. They may be able to:
Access and retain information stored in your account, like your email
View statistics regarding your account, like how many apps you install
Change your account password
Suspend or terminate your account access
Receive your account information in order to satisfy applicable law, regulation, legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Restrict your ability to delete or edit your information or your privacy settings
For external processing
We provide personal information to our
affiliates
and other trusted businesses or persons to process it for us, based on our instructions and in compliance with our Privacy Policy and any other appropriate confidentiality and security measures. For example, we use service providers to help operate our data centers, deliver our products and services, improve our internal business processes, and offer additional support to customers and users. We also use service providers to help review YouTube video content for public safety and analyze and listen to samples of saved user audio to help improve Google’s audio recognition technologies.
For legal reasons
We will share personal information outside of Google if we have a good-faith belief that disclosure of the information is reasonably necessary to:
Respond to any applicable law, regulation,
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
. We share information about the number and type of requests we receive from governments in our
Transparency Report
.
Enforce applicable Terms of Service, including investigation of potential violations.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security, or technical issues.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our
users
, or the public.
We may share
non-personally identifiable information
publicly and with our partners — like publishers, advertisers, developers, or rights holders. For example, we share information publicly to
show trends
about the general use of our services. We also allow
specific partners
to collect information from your browser or device for advertising and measurement purposes using their own cookies or similar technologies.
If Google is involved in a merger, acquisition, or sale of assets, we’ll continue to ensure the confidentiality of your personal information and give affected users notice before personal information is transferred or becomes subject to a different privacy policy.
Keeping your information secure
We build security into our services to protect your information
All Google products are built with strong security features that continuously protect your information. The insights we gain from maintaining our services help us detect and automatically block security threats from ever reaching you. And if we do detect something risky that we think you should know about, we’ll notify you and help guide you through steps to stay better protected.
We work hard to protect you and Google from unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction of information we hold, including:
We use encryption to keep your data private while in transit
We offer a range of security features, like
Safe Browsing
, Security Checkup, and
2 Step Verification
to help you protect your account
We review our information collection, storage, and processing practices, including physical security measures, to prevent unauthorized access to our systems
We restrict access to personal information to Google employees, contractors, and agents who need that information in order to process it. Anyone with this access is subject to strict contractual confidentiality obligations and may be disciplined or terminated if they fail to meet these obligations.
Exporting & deleting your information
You can export a copy of your information or delete it from your Google Account at any time
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Retaining your information
We retain the data we collect for different periods of time depending on what it is, how we use it, and how you configure your settings:
Some data you can delete whenever you like, such as your
personal info
or the content you create or upload, like
photos
and
documents
. You can also delete
activity information
saved in your account, or
choose to have it deleted automatically
after a set period of time. We’ll keep this data in your Google Account until you remove it or choose to have it removed.
Other data is deleted or anonymized automatically after a set period of time, such as
advertising data
in server logs.
We keep some data until you delete your Google Account, such as information about how often you use our services.
And some data we retain for longer periods of time when necessary for legitimate business or legal purposes, such as security, fraud and abuse prevention, or financial record-keeping.
When you delete data, we follow a deletion process to make sure that your data is safely and completely removed from our servers or retained only in anonymized form. We try to ensure that our services protect information from accidental or malicious deletion. Because of this, there may be delays between when you delete something and when copies are deleted from our active and backup systems.
You can read more about Google’s
data retention periods
, including how long it takes us to delete your information.
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
We regularly review this Privacy Policy and make sure that we process your information in ways that comply with it.
Data transfers
We maintain
servers around the world
and your information may be processed on servers located outside of the country where you live. Data protection laws vary among countries, with some providing more protection than others. Regardless of where your information is processed, we apply the same protections described in this policy. We also comply with certain
legal frameworks
relating to the transfer of data.
When we receive formal written complaints, we respond by contacting the person who made the complaint. We work with the appropriate regulatory authorities, including local data protection authorities, to resolve any complaints regarding the transfer of your data that we cannot resolve with you directly.
European requirements
How to exercise your rights and contact Google
If European Union (EU) or United Kingdom (UK) data protection law applies to the processing of your information, we provide the
controls
described in this policy so you can exercise your rights to request access to, update,
remove
, and restrict the processing of your information. You also have the right to object to the processing of your information or export your information to another service.
If you have additional questions or requests related to your rights,
you can contact Google and our data protection office
. And you can contact your local data protection authority if you have concerns regarding your rights under local law.
Data controller
Unless otherwise stated in a service-specific privacy notice, the
data controller responsible for processing your information
depends on where you are based:
Google Ireland Limited for users of Google services based in the European Economic Area or Switzerland, located at Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland.
Google LLC for users of Google services based in the United Kingdom, located at 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, California 94043, USA.
Google LLC is the data controller responsible for processing information indexed and displayed in services like
Google Search
and Google Maps regardless of your location. Google Ireland Limited is the data controller responsible for processing information to train Google’s AI models for the purpose of deploying them in services provided by Google Ireland Limited in the European Economic Area or Switzerland.
Legal bases of processing
We process your information for the
purposes
described in this policy, based on the following legal grounds:
We process your data in order to provide a service you’ve asked for under a contract.
We process your data for our legitimate interests and those of
third parties
while applying
appropriate safeguards
that protect your privacy.
We process your data when necessary to protect the vital interests of you or another person.
We process your data when we have a legal obligation to do so.
We ask for your consent to process your data for specific purposes and you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time.
How you use Google services and your privacy settings will determine what data is processed, the purposes for which this data is processed, and the legal bases for processing data. The table below explains these processing purposes, the kinds of data processed, and the legal grounds for processing this data, in more detail.
Why and how we process data
What data is processed
Legal grounds
To provide Google services, products, and features
Examples of processing activities:
We process the terms you search for in order to return results.
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video.
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account.
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, we use your shipping address or delivery instructions for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
We process your payment information when you buy extra storage for Google Drive.
We can use contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail.
Google also collects information about you from publicly accessible sources. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
We can help you share your location using
Google Location Sharing
, so that others can find you on a map, or know your estimated time of arrival.
As described in the
Sharing your information
section, we’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent, and provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as loading a YouTube video, or processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order when you purchase services or physical goods from us.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users
. For example, using contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
With your
consent
, such as when you choose to share your location with Google Location Sharing.
To maintain and improve Google services, products, and features
To maintain the service so it works as intended, such as debugging the service, tracking issues or troubleshooting issues.
Examples of processing activities:
We continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
We log users’ interactions with buttons on apps like Google Maps and Search to help understand if they are functioning as intended.
To make improvements to Google services and to help improve the safety and reliability of these services, such as to detect, prevent, and respond to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm the service or users.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your interactions with our services to help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
We analyze which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
We analyze usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
We analyze queries on Google Shopping in order to determine which products, merchants, and brands are relevant to different kinds of queries.
Google Chrome’s Safe Browsing feature can send information about suspicious websites between a user’s browser and Google's servers to help protect against phishing, malware, malicious ads, and more.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as using logs of interactions with Google apps to ensure they are working as intended.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, improving Google Translate’s translation quality and increasing the availability of Translate in more languages.
To develop new Google services, products and features
Examples of processing activities:
Understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Understanding how users view and creators generate short-form content helped Google develop new YouTube services.
Depending on your settings, we can save audio recordings of voice interactions with services like Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
We use publicly available information online or from other public sources to help train new machine learning models and build foundational technologies that power various Google products such as Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
We use your interactions with AI models and technologies like Gemini Apps to develop, train, fine-tune, and improve these models to better handle your requests, and update their classifiers and filters including for safety, language understanding, and factuality.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, understanding how people used photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos. Or using information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features using these foundational technologies, like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, using information about your activity in our services, like your interactions with Gemini Apps, to train and improve machine learning models, and update their language understanding capabilities, safety classifiers and filters.
With your
consent
, such as saving audio recordings of voice interactions with Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
To provide personalized services, including content and ads
To customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and customized search results.
Examples of processing activities:
Google’s Security Checkup feature provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products.
Google News may provide you with local news results based on your approximate location.
Google Search may provide you with results based on your approximate location.
Google Assistant can use your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
Google Play uses information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
We may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
Google can show you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips.
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services.
Depending on your settings, to show you personalized ads based on your interests.
Examples of processing activities:
If you search for “mountain bikes” or watch videos of mountain biking, you may see an ad for sports equipment in your search results or on YouTube.
If you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web.
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when Google Assistant uses your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Customize our services to provide you with a better user experience.
For example, displaying a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country, providing security tips adapted to how you use Google products, or tailoring the experience to be age-appropriate, if relevant.
Provide advertising, which allows us to offer many of our services without a fee.
For example, showing you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips. (And when ads are personalized, we ask for your consent.)
With your
consent
, such as recommending apps on Google Play based on videos you’ve watched on YouTube, or showing you personalized ads based on your interests, like ads that relate to baking as you browse the web after watching videos about baking on YouTube.
To measure performance - We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design.
We use data about the ads you interact with to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns.
We use data about which places users click most on Google Earth to understand which features are popular and to identify bugs.
Google Search measures the number of times a particular query has been made, and how users perceive the quality of their search results, to make Search more useful.
Google Translate analyzes data on the number of translations made and the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality, in order to identify potential new features and address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
We may share non-personally identifiable information with our partners like content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, monitoring usage patterns on Google Earth to identify bugs.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality on Google Translate in order to address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, analyzing data on the number of translations made on Google Translate to identify potential new features.
Fulfill obligations to our partners like developers and rights holders.
For example, providing reporting to content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
To communicate with you - We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly.
Examples of processing activities:
We may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location.
We may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
If you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Google services like Photos may send you marketing communications about its product offerings like printing promotions, depending on your settings.
Google services like YouTube Premium and YouTube Music Premium may notify you about upcoming changes to your subscription.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when you contact Google for support or sign up for communications about product updates.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, informing you about our services, such as to let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
Marketing to inform users about our services.
For example, emailing users of Photos about a printing promotion.
To protect Google, our users, and the public
To help improve the safety and reliability of our services, including detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or the public.
Examples of processing activities:
We collect and analyze IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
We analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
We process information about requests to remove content from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
To meet any applicable law, regulation, legal process or enforceable governmental request.
Examples of processing activities:
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process.
Legal obligations sometimes require us to retain certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, such as information about a payment you’ve made to Google for tax or accounting purposes.
Various laws and regulations require us to put in place measures to confirm that our users are old enough to use our services. To help determine your age, we process the date of birth you provide. We also process information about your activity in our services, both when you’re signed in to a Google Account or signed out, and use machine learning technology to determine if you are likely over 18. In certain cases, if we cannot confirm that you are old enough to use our services by other means, we can request other information to verify your age, like your government ID, credit card, a photo of you, or your phone number.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Enforce legal claims, including investigation of potential violations of applicable Terms of Service.
For example, analyzing content to help us detect abuse such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our users, or the public, including disclosing information to government authorities.
For example, responding to legal process or enforceable requests from governments and courts to disclose data, after carefully reviewing each request to make sure it satisfies applicable laws.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, processing information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
When necessary to protect the
vital interests
of you or another person. For example, processing data to detect and combat online child sexual abuse.
When we have a
legal obligation
to do so, such as retaining certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, or processing and retaining information to help ensure that users are old enough to use our services.
Linking your Google services
If you’re a user in the EU, we offer you the choice to keep certain Google services linked. You can learn more about your linked services and how to manage your choices at
About DMA & Your Linked Services
.
About this policy
When this policy applies
This Privacy Policy applies to all of the services offered by Google LLC and its
affiliates
, including YouTube, Android, and services offered on third-party sites, such as advertising services. This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to services that have separate privacy policies that do not incorporate this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to:
The information practices of other companies and organizations that advertise our services
Services offered by other companies or individuals, including products or sites they offer that may include Google services to which the policy applies, or products or sites displayed to you in search results, or linked from our services
Changes to this policy
We change this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will not reduce your rights under this Privacy Policy without your explicit consent. We always indicate the date the last changes were published and we offer access to
archived versions
for your review. If changes are significant, we’ll provide a more prominent notice (including, for certain services, email notification of Privacy Policy changes).
Related privacy practices
Specific Google services
The following privacy notices provide additional information about some Google services:
Payments
Fiber
Gemini Apps
Google Fi
Google Workspace for Education
Read Along
YouTube Kids
Google Accounts Managed with Family Link, for Children under 13 (or applicable age in your country)
Family Link privacy guide for children & teens
Voice and Audio Collection from Children’s Features on the Google Assistant
If you’re a member of an organization that uses Google Workspace or Google Cloud Platform, learn how these services collect and use your personal information in the
Google Cloud Privacy Notice
.
Other useful resources
The following links highlight useful resources for you to learn more about our practices and privacy settings.
Your Google Account
is home to many of the settings you can use to manage your account
Privacy Checkup
guides you through key privacy settings for your Google Account
Google’s safety center
helps you learn more about our built-in security, privacy controls, and tools to help set digital ground rules for your family online
Google’s Teen Privacy Guide
provides answers to some of the top questions we get asked about privacy
Privacy & Terms
provides more context regarding this Privacy Policy and our Terms of Service
Technologies
includes more information about:
How Google uses cookies
Technologies used for
Advertising
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Key terms
Affiliates
An affiliate is an entity that belongs to the Google group of companies, including the following companies that provide consumer services in the EU: Google Ireland Limited, Google Commerce Ltd, Google Payment Corp, and Google Dialer Inc. Learn more about the
companies providing business services in the EU
.
Algorithm
A process or set of rules followed by a computer in performing problem-solving operations.
Application data cache
An application data cache is a data repository on a device. It can, for example, enable a web application to run without an internet connection and improve the performance of the application by enabling faster loading of content.
Browser web storage
Browser web storage enables websites to store data in a browser on a device. When used in "local storage" mode, it enables data to be stored across sessions. This makes data retrievable even after a browser has been closed and reopened. One technology that facilitates web storage is HTML 5.
Cookies
A cookie is a small file containing a string of characters that is sent to your computer when you visit a website. When you visit the site again, the cookie allows that site to recognize your browser. Cookies may store user preferences and other information. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. However, some website features or services may not function properly without cookies. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
and how Google uses data, including cookies,
when you use our partners' sites or apps
.
Device
A device is a computer that can be used to access Google services. For example, desktop computers, tablets, smart speakers, and smartphones are all considered devices.
Google Account
You may access some of our services by signing up for a
Google Account
and providing us with some personal information (typically your name, email address, and a password). This account information is used to authenticate you when you access Google services and protect your account from unauthorized access by others. You can edit or delete your account at any time through your Google Account settings.
IP address
Every device connected to the Internet is assigned a number known as an Internet protocol (IP) address. These numbers are usually assigned in geographic blocks. An IP address can often be used to identify the location from which a device is connecting to the Internet. Learn more about
how we use location information.
Non-personally identifiable information
This is information that is recorded about users so that it no longer reflects or references an individually-identifiable user.
Personal information
This is information that you provide to us which personally identifies you, such as your name, email address, or billing information, or other data that can be reasonably linked to such information by Google, such as information we associate with your Google Account.
Pixel tag
A pixel tag is a type of technology placed on a website or within the body of an email for the purpose of tracking certain activity, such as views of a website or when an email is opened. Pixel tags are often used in combination with cookies.
Referrer URL
A Referrer URL (Uniform Resource Locator) is information transmitted to a destination webpage by a web browser, typically when you click a link to that page. The Referrer URL contains the URL of the last webpage the browser visited.
Sensitive personal information
This is a particular category of personal information relating to topics such as confidential medical facts, racial or ethnic origins, political or religious beliefs, or sexuality.
Server logs
Like most websites, our servers automatically record the page requests made when you visit our sites. These “server logs” typically include your web request, Internet Protocol address, browser type, browser language, the date and time of your request, and one or more cookies that may uniquely identify your browser.
A typical log entry for a search for “cars” looks like this:
123.45.67.89 - 25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 -
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars -
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7 -
740674ce2123e969
123.45.67.89
is the Internet Protocol address assigned to the user by the user’s ISP. Depending on the user’s service, a different address may be assigned to the user by their service provider each time they connect to the Internet.
25/Mar/2003 10:15:32
is the date and time of the query.
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars
is the requested URL, including the search query.
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7
is the browser and operating system being used.
740674ce2123a969
is the unique cookie ID assigned to this particular computer the first time it visited Google. (Cookies can be deleted by users. If the user has deleted the cookie from the computer since the last time they’ve visited Google, then it will be the unique cookie ID assigned to their device the next time they visit Google from that particular device).
Unique identifiers
A unique identifier is a string of characters that can be used to uniquely identify a browser, app, or device. Different identifiers vary in how permanent they are, whether they can be reset by users, and how they can be accessed.
Unique identifiers can be used for various purposes, including security and fraud detection, syncing services such as your email inbox, remembering your preferences, and providing personalized advertising. For example, unique identifiers stored in cookies help sites display content in your browser in your preferred language. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
.
On other platforms besides browsers, unique identifiers are used to recognize a specific device or app on that device. For example, a unique identifier such as the Advertising ID is used to provide relevant advertising on Android devices, and can be
managed
in your device’s settings. Unique identifiers may also be incorporated into a device by its manufacturer (sometimes called a universally unique ID or UUID), such as the IMEI-number of a mobile phone. For example, a device’s unique identifier can be used to customize our service to your device or analyze device issues related to our services.
Additional Context
Activity on Google Services
If you’re signed in to your Google Account and have Web & App Activity turned on, your activity data on Google sites, apps, and services may be saved in your account’s Web & App Activity. Some activity may include information about the general area you were in when using the Google service. When you search for something using a general area, your search will use an area of at least 3 sq km, or expand until the area represents the locations of at least 1,000 people. This helps protect your privacy.
In some cases, areas that you have searched from in the past may be used to estimate a relevant location for your search. For example, if you search for coffee shops while in Chelsea, Google might show results for Chelsea in future searches.
You can view and control your Web & App Activity at
My Activity
.
activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Websites and apps that integrate Google services like ads and analytics share information with us.
This information is collected regardless of which browser or browser mode you use. For example, although Incognito mode in Chrome can help keep your browsing private from other people who use your device, third party sites and apps that integrate our services may still share information with Google when you visit them.
You can
learn more
about some of the ways you can control the information that is shared when you visit or interact with sites and apps that use Google services.
ads you’ll find most useful
For example, if you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web. We also may use your IP address to determine your approximate location, so that we can serve you ads for a nearby pizza delivery service if you search for “pizza.” Learn more
about Google ads
and
why you may see particular ads
.
advertising and research services on their behalf
For example, merchants may upload data from their loyalty-card programs so that they can include loyalty information in search or shopping results, or better understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We only provide aggregated reports to advertisers that don’t reveal information about individual people.
Android device with Google apps
Android devices with Google apps include devices sold by Google or one of our partners and include phones, cameras, vehicles, wearables, and televisions. These devices use Google Play Services and other pre-installed apps that include services like Gmail, Maps, your phone’s camera and phone dialer, text-to-speech conversion, keyboard input, and security features. Learn more about
Google Play Services
.
appropriate safeguards
For example, we may anonymize data, or encrypt data to ensure it can’t be linked to other information about you.
Learn more
benefits the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
customized search results
For example, when you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services. You can
learn more here
. You may also get customized search results even when you’re signed out. If you don’t want this level of search customization, you can
search and browse privately
or turn off
signed-out search personalization
.
Customizing our services
For example, we may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
data controller responsible for processing your information
This means the Google affiliate that is responsible for processing your information and for complying with applicable privacy laws.
deliver our services
Examples of how we use your information to deliver our services include:
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
Learn more
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, you may provide us information like your shipping address or delivery instructions. We use this information for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
detect abuse
When we detect spam, malware, illegal content (including
child sexual abuse and exploitation material
), and other forms of abuse on our systems in violation of our policies, we may disable your account or take other appropriate action. In certain circumstances, we may also report the violation to appropriate authorities.
devices
For example, we can use information from your devices to help you decide which device you’d like to use to install an app or view a movie you buy from Google Play. We also use this information to help protect your account.
ensure and improve
For example, we analyze how people interact with advertising to improve the performance of our ads.
ensure our services are working as intended
For example, we continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
Information about things near your device
If you use Google’s Location services on Android, we can improve the performance of apps that rely on your location, like Google Maps. If you use Google’s Location services, your device sends information to Google about its location, sensors (like accelerometer), and nearby cell towers and Wi-Fi access points (like MAC address and signal strength). All these things help to determine your location. You can use your device settings to enable Google Location services.
Learn more
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process. Learn more in our
Transparency Report
.
make improvements
For example, we use cookies to analyze how people interact with our services. And that analysis can help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
may link information
Google Analytics relies on first-party cookies, which means the cookies are set by the Google Analytics customer. Using our systems, data generated through Google Analytics can be linked by the Google Analytics customer and by Google to third-party cookies that are related to visits to other websites. For example, an advertiser may want to use its Google Analytics data to create more relevant ads, or to further analyze its traffic.
Learn more
our users
For example, to prevent abuse and increase transparency and accountability over our online content moderation practices, Google shares data about requests for removal of content from our services with Lumen, which collects and analyzes these requests to facilitate research to help Internet users understand their rights.
Learn more
.
partner with Google
There are over 2 million non-Google websites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Learn more
payment information
For example, if you add a credit card or other payment method to your Google Account, you can use it to buy things across our services, like apps in the Play Store. We may also ask for other information, like a business tax ID, to help process your payment. In some cases, we may also need to verify your identity and may ask you for information to do this.
We may also use payment information to verify that you meet age requirements, if, for example, you enter an incorrect birthday indicating you’re not old enough to have a Google Account.
Learn more
personalized ads
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
Learn more
phone number
If you add your phone number to your account, it can be used for different purposes across Google services, depending on your settings. For example, your phone number can be used to help you access your account if you forget your password, help people find and connect with you, and make the ads you see more relevant to you.
Learn more
Places you label like home and work
You might choose to save places to your Google Account that are important to you, such as your home or your work. If you set your home or work addresses, they can be used to help you do things more easily, such as getting directions or finding results closer to your home or work, and for more useful ads.
You can edit or delete your home or work addresses anytime in your
Google Account.
protect against abuse
For example, information about security threats can help us notify you if we think your account has been compromised (at which point we can help you take steps to protect your account).
publicly accessible sources
For example, we may collect information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
rely on cookies to function properly
For example, we use a cookie called ‘lbcs’ that makes it possible for you to open many Google Docs in one browser. Blocking this cookie would prevent Google Docs from working as expected.
Learn more
remove
For example, as described above, you can
request to remove content
, including content that may contain your information, from specific Google services, based on applicable law (including data protection law) and our policies.
safety and reliability
Some examples of how we use your information to help keep our services safe and reliable include:
Collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
Learn more
sensitive categories
When showing you personalized ads, we use topics that we think might be of interest to you based on your activity. For example, you may see ads for things like "Cooking and Recipes" or "Air Travel.” We don’t use topics or show personalized ads based on sensitive categories like race, religion, sexual orientation, or health. And we
require the same from advertisers
that use our services.
Sensor data from your device
Your device may have sensors that can be used to better understand your location and movement. For example, an accelerometer can be used to determine your speed and a gyroscope to figure out your direction of travel. Learn more about
how we use location information.
servers around the world
For example, we operate data centers located
around the world
to help keep our products continuously available for users.
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
Examples of these services include:
Google Voice, for making and receiving calls, sending text messages, and managing voicemail
Google Meet, for making and receiving video calls
Gmail, for sending and receiving emails
Google Chat, for sending and receiving messages
Google Duo, for making and receiving video calls and sending and receiving messages
Google Fi, for a phone plan
show trends
When lots of people start searching for something, it can provide useful information about particular trends at that time. Google Trends samples Google web searches to estimate the popularity of searches over a certain period of time and shares those results publicly in aggregated terms.
Learn more
similar information related to your physical or mental health
If you use fitness products and apps we offer, such as Fitbit, Pixel Watch, Nest or Google Fit, we collect data you provide, like your height and weight. We also collect information from these apps and devices, such as your sleep patterns, heart rate, skin temperature, calories burned, and steps taken.
specific Google services
For example, you can delete
your blog
from Blogger or
a Google Site you own
from Google Sites. You can also delete
reviews
you’ve left on apps, games, and other content in the Play Store.
specific partners
For example, we allow YouTube creators and advertisers to work with measurement companies to learn about the audience of their YouTube videos or ads, using cookies or similar technologies. Another example is merchants on our shopping pages, who use cookies to understand how many different people see their product listings.
Learn more
about these partners and how they use your information.
synced with your Google Account
Your Chrome browsing history is only saved to your account if you’ve enabled Chrome synchronization with your Google Account.
Learn more
the people who matter most to you online
For example, when you type an address in the To, Cc, or Bcc field of an email you're composing, Gmail will suggest addresses based on the people you
contact most frequently
.
the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
third parties
For example, we process your information to report use statistics to rights holders about how their content was used in our services. We may also process your information if people search for your name and we display search results for sites containing publicly available information about you.
use the information we collect across our services
Depending on your available settings, some examples of how we use the information we collect across our services include:
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and search on Google, you can see search results from the public web, along with relevant information from the content you have in other Google products, like Gmail or Google Calendar. This can include things like the status of your upcoming flights, restaurant, and hotel reservations, or your photos.
Learn more
If you have communicated with someone via Gmail and want to add them to a Google Doc or an event in Google Calendar, Google makes it easy to do so by autocompleting their email address when you start to type in their name. This feature makes it easier to share things with people you know.
Learn more
The Google app can use data that you have stored in other Google products to show you personalized content, depending on your settings. For example, if you have searches stored in your Web & App Activity, the Google app can show you news articles and other information about your interests, like sports scores, based on your activity.
If you connect your Google Account to your Google Home, you can manage your information and get things done through the Google Assistant. For example, you can add events to your Google Calendar or get your schedule for the day, ask for status updates on your upcoming flight, or send information like driving directions to your phone.
Learn more
If you’re a user in the EU, the decisions you make on linking services will affect how certain Google services can use the data across our services.
Views and interactions with content and ads
For example, we collect information about views and interactions with ads so we can provide aggregated reports to advertisers, like telling them whether we served their ad on a page and whether the ad was likely seen by a viewer. We may also measure other interactions, such as how you move your mouse over an ad or if you interact with the page on which the ad appears.
Voice and audio information
For example, you can choose whether you want Google to save an audio recording to your Google Account when you interact with Google Search, Assistant, and Maps. When your device detects an audio activation command, like “Hey Google,” Google records your voice and audio plus a few seconds before the activation.
Learn more
your activity on other sites and apps
This activity might come from your use of Google services, like from syncing your account with Chrome or your visits to sites and apps that partner with Google. Many websites and apps partner with Google to improve their content and services. For example, a website might use our advertising services (like AdSense) or analytics tools (like Google Analytics), or it might embed other content (such as videos from YouTube). These services may share information about your activity with Google and, depending on your
account settings
and the products in use (for instance, when a partner uses Google Analytics in conjunction with our advertising services), this data may be associated with your personal information.
Learn more
about how Google uses data when you use our partners' sites or apps.
Google
About Google
Privacy
Terms
Transparency Center
A drop down list to change the language of the site. Each option is a language name. There are 65 language options.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Main menu
Google apps
Sub-policy 1
https://www.apple.com/br/legal/privacy/br/:
Apple
Loja
Comprar os lançamentos
Mac
iPad
iPhone
Apple Watch
Acessórios
Encontre uma loja
Status do pedido
Financiamento
Oferta para universitários
Educação
Negócios
Mac
Explorar todos os modelos de Mac
MacBook Air
MacBook Pro
iMac
Mac mini
Mac Studio
Mac Pro
Monitores
Comparar Mac
Mude do PC para o Mac
Comprar Mac
Acessórios para Mac
Financiamento
Oferta para universitários
Suporte para Mac
Produtos AppleCare
macOS Sequoia
Apple Intelligence
Apps da Apple
Continuidade
iCloud+
Mac nos negócios
Educação
iPad
Explorar todos os modelos de iPad
iPad Pro
iPad Air
iPad
iPad mini
Apple Pencil
Teclados
Comparar iPad
Por que iPad
Comprar iPad
Acessórios para iPad
Financiamento
Oferta para universitários
Suporte para iPad
Produtos AppleCare
iPadOS 18
Apple Intelligence
Apps da Apple
iCloud+
Educação
iPhone
Explorar todos os modelos de iPhone
iPhone 16 Pro
iPhone 16
iPhone 16e
iPhone 15
Comparar iPhone
Mudar do Android
Comprar iPhone
Acessórios para iPhone
Financiamento
Suporte para iPhone
iOS 18
Apple Intelligence
Apps da Apple
Privacidade no iPhone
iCloud+
Carteira, Apple Pay
Siri
Apple Watch
Explorar todos os modelos de Apple Watch
Apple Watch Series 10
Apple Watch Ultra 2
Apple Watch SE
Apple Watch Nike
Comparar Apple Watch
Por que Apple Watch
Comprar Apple Watch
Pulseiras para Apple Watch
Acessórios para Apple Watch
Financiamento
Suporte para Apple Watch
watchOS 11
Apps da Apple
Apple Fitness+
AirPods
Explorar todos os modelos de AirPods
AirPods 4
AirPods Pro 2
AirPods Max
Comparar AirPods
Comprar AirPods
Acessórios para AirPods
Suporte para AirPods
Apple Music
TV e Casa
Explorar TV e Casa
Apple TV 4K
Comprar Apple TV 4K
Comprar Siri Remote
Acessórios para TV e Casa
Suporte para Apple TV
Produtos AppleCare
App Apple TV
Apple TV+
App Casa
Apple Music
Siri
AirPlay
Entretenimento
Explorar Entretenimento
Apple One
Apple TV+
Apple Music
Apple Arcade
Apple Fitness+
Apple Podcasts
Apple Books
App Store
Suporte para Apple TV+
Suporte para Apple Music
Acessórios
Ver todos os acessórios
Mac
iPad
iPhone
Apple Watch
AirPods
TV e Casa
Criados pela Apple
Beats by Dr. Dre
AirTag
Suporte
iPhone
Mac
iPad
Apple Watch
AirPods
Música
TV
Explorar suporte
Comunidade
Verificar cobertura
Reparos
Comprar produtos AppleCare
Conta Apple e senha
Cobrança e assinaturas
Acessibilidade
Encontre uma loja
Comprar na Apple Store online
Acessórios
AirPods
Apple Intelligence
0
+
Privacidade
Local Nav Open Menu
Local Nav Close Menu
Visão geral
Recursos
Dados
Gerencie sua privacidade
Relatório de transparência
Política de Privacidade
Português, Brasil
Selecione o idioma preferido
Na Apple, acreditamos fortemente nos direitos essenciais relacionados à privacidade — e que tais direitos essenciais devem ser iguais, independentemente do local onde você mora.
É por isso que processamos todos os dados relacionados a uma pessoa identificada ou identificável ou que estejam vinculados ou sejam vinculáveis a ela pela Apple como “dados pessoais”, independentemente de onde a pessoa more.
Isso significa que os dados que identifiquem você diretamente, como o seu nome, são considerados dados pessoais. São pessoais também os dados que não identificam você diretamente, mas que podem ser usados para identificar você, como o número de série do seu aparelho. Dados agregados são considerados dados não pessoais para os fins desta Política de Privacidade.
Esta Política de Privacidade explica como
a Apple ou uma empresa afiliada à Apple
(coletivamente, “Apple”) processa dados pessoais, independentemente de você interagir conosco em nossos sites, por meio de apps da Apple (como o Apple Music ou a Carteira) ou pessoalmente (inclusive por telefone ou ao visitar uma Apple Store). A Apple também pode criar links para terceiros em nossos serviços ou disponibilizar apps de terceiros para download na App Store. A Política de Privacidade da Apple não se aplica a como terceiros definem ou usam dados pessoais. Recomendamos que você leia as políticas de privacidade deles e conheça os próprios direitos de privacidade antes de interagir com eles.
Na Apple, respeitamos sua capacidade de conhecer, acessar, corrigir, transferir, restringir o processamento e apagar seus dados pessoais. Fornecemos esses direitos à nossa base global de clientes. Se optar por exercer esses direitos de privacidade, você terá o direito de não ser tratado de maneira discriminatória nem de receber serviço inferior da Apple. Quando for solicitado o consentimento para o processamento dos seus dados pessoais pela Apple, você terá o direito de retirar seu consentimento a qualquer momento.
Para exercer seus direitos de privacidade e suas escolhas, incluindo quando um provedor de serviços terceirizado agir em nome da Apple, acesse a página de Dados e privacidade da Apple em
privacy.apple.com/br
para Apple ou
shazam.com/pt-br/privacy
para Shazam.
Para garantir a segurança dos seus dados pessoais, você deve iniciar sessão na conta para confirmar sua identidade. Se você quiser obter uma cópia de dados pessoais que não estão disponíveis no momento em
privacy.apple.com/br
, faça uma solicitação em
apple.com/legal/privacy/contact
. Você também tem o direito de fazer uma reclamação ao regulador aplicável.
Pode haver situações em que não seja possível atender à sua solicitação. Por exemplo, se você solicitar a exclusão dos dados da sua transação e a Apple for legalmente obrigada a manter um registro dessa transação para cumprir a lei. Também podemos nos recusar a atender uma solicitação que possa prejudicar nosso uso legítimo dos dados para fins de segurança e prevenção de fraude, como quando você solicita a exclusão de uma conta que está sendo investigada por questões de segurança. Sua solicitação de privacidade também poderá ser recusada se ela colocar em risco a privacidade de outras pessoas ou for infundada, vexatória, extremamente impraticável ou não razoável.
Se você reside na Califórnia e não consegue acessar a página de Dados e privacidade da Apple,
você ou seu agente autorizado pode fazer uma solicitação acessando a página
apple.com/legal/privacy/contact
ou ligando para 1-800-275-2273.
Para obter mais informações sobre o exercício de seus direitos, acesse
support.apple.com/102283
.
Na Apple, acreditamos que você pode ter produtos incríveis e proteger sua privacidade. Sendo assim, nós nos esforçamos para
coletar somente os dados pessoais necessários
. Os dados pessoais coletados pela Apple dependem de como você interage com a Apple. Descrições de como a Apple processa dados pessoais para certos serviços individuais estão disponíveis em
apple.com/br/legal/privacy/data
.
Quando você cria uma Conta Apple, solicita crédito comercial, compra e/ou ativa um produto ou aparelho, baixa uma atualização de software, se inscreve em uma aula em uma Apple Store, estabelece conexão com os nossos serviços, entra em contato conosco (inclusive pelas redes sociais), participa de uma pesquisa online ou, de outra maneira, interage com a Apple, podemos coletar diversas informações, incluindo:
Informações da Conta.
Sua Conta Apple e os dados da conta relacionados, incluindo endereço de e-mail, aparelhos registrados, status da conta e idade
Informações Relacionadas ao Aparelho.
Dados que podem identificar o seu aparelho, como o número de série dele, ou sobre seu aparelho, como o tipo de navegador
Informações de Contato
. Dados como nome, endereço de e-mail, endereço de correspondência, número de telefone ou outras informações de contato
Informações Relacionadas a Pagamentos. Dados sobre seu endereço de cobrança e método de pagamento, como dados bancários ou outras informações do cartão de pagamento, de crédito ou de débito
Informações Relacionadas a Transações.
Dados sobre compras de produtos e de serviços Apple ou transações realizadas pela Apple, incluindo compras em plataformas da Apple
Informações de Prevenção de Fraude.
Dados usados para ajudar a identificar e prevenir fraudes, incluindo uma pontuação de confiança do aparelho
Dados de Uso.
Dados sobre sua atividade e uso de nossas ofertas, como lançamentos de apps em nossos serviços, incluindo histórico de navegação, histórico de pesquisa, interação com o produto, dados de falhas, de desempenho e outros dados de diagnóstico e outros dados de uso
Informações Relacionadas à Localização
. Localização precisa apenas para uso em serviços como Buscar ou, se você tiver dado seu consentimento, para serviços específicos da região e localização aproximada
Informações Relacionadas à Saúde.
Dados relacionados ao estado de saúde de uma pessoa, incluindo dados relacionados à saúde ou condição física ou mental. Os dados pessoais de saúde também incluem dados que podem ser usados para tirar conclusões ou descobrir o estado de saúde de uma pessoa. Se você participar de um estudo usando um app de Estudos de pesquisa sobre saúde da Apple, a política que rege a privacidade de seus dados pessoais está descrita na
Política de Privacidade dos Apps dos Estudos sobre Saúde da Apple
.
Informações Relacionadas ao Bem-estar.
Dados relacionados à sua condição física e informações sobre exercícios nos locais em que você decidir compartilhá-los
Informações Financeiras.
Dados, incluindo salário, renda e informações de ativos nos locais coletados, bem como informações relacionadas a ofertas financeiras da Apple
Dados de Documento de Identificação Emitido pelo Governo.
Em certas jurisdições, podemos solicitar um documento de identificação emitido pelo governo em circunstâncias limitadas, inclusive ao configurar uma conta sem fio e ativar seu aparelho, com a finalidade de estender o crédito comercial, gerenciar reservas ou conforme exigido por lei
Outras Informações Fornecidas por Você.
Dados como o conteúdo de suas comunicações com a Apple, incluindo interações com o suporte ao cliente e contatos por meio de redes sociais
Você não tem obrigação de fornecer os dados pessoais que solicitamos. No entanto, se você decidir não fornecer esses dados, em muitos casos, não será possível fornecer nossos produtos ou serviços ou responder às suas solicitações.
A Apple pode receber dados pessoais sobre você de outras
pessoas
, de empresas ou terceiros agindo
de acordo com sua orientação
, de nossos
parceiros
que trabalham conosco para fornecer nossos produtos e serviços e nos ajudar na segurança e prevenção de fraude, bem como de outras
fontes legais.
Pessoas.
A Apple pode coletar dados sobre você por meio de outras pessoas. Por exemplo, se essa pessoa enviou um produto ou cartão-presente para você, convidou você para participar de um serviço ou fórum da Apple ou compartilhou conteúdo com você.
De Acordo com Sua Orientação.
Você pode instruir outras pessoas ou terceiros a compartilhar dados com a Apple. Por exemplo, você pode instruir sua operadora de celular a compartilhar dados sobre a sua conta da operadora com a Apple para ativar sua conta ou instruir seu programa de fidelidade a compartilhar informações sobre a sua participação para que você possa ganhar recompensas por compras da Apple.
Parceiros da Apple.
Também podemos validar as informações que você fornece. Por exemplo, ao criar uma Conta Apple com um terceiro por motivos de segurança e para fins de prevenção de fraude.
Para ativar recursos como pesquisa e como uma fonte para nossos modelos de IA de base, a Apple utiliza o Applebot, um rastreador da Web, para buscar informações que estão publicamente disponíveis na Internet. Temos medidas em vigor para reduzir a quantidade de dados pessoais que coletamos e não tentamos associar os dados rastreados a usuários individuais da Apple, nem criar perfis sobre indivíduos. Seus dados pessoais privados não são usados para treinar nossos modelos de IA de base. Para exercer seu direito de optar pela exclusão do processamento, acesse o
formulário Apple Intelligence Privacy Inquiries
(Consultas de Privacidade da Apple Intelligence). Para obter mais informações sobre o Applebot, consulte
support.apple.com/120320
.
Para fins de pesquisa e desenvolvimento, podemos usar conjuntos de dados, como aqueles que contêm imagens, vozes ou outros dados que possam estar associados a uma pessoa identificável. Ao coletar esses conjuntos de dados, seguimos as leis aplicáveis, incluindo as leis na jurisdição em que eles são hospedados. Ao usar esses conjuntos de dados para pesquisa e desenvolvimento, não tentamos identificar novamente as pessoas que podem aparecer neles.
A Apple usa os dados pessoais para viabilizar os serviços, processar suas transações, comunicar-se com você, garantir a segurança, prevenir fraudes e seguir a lei. Também podemos usar dados pessoais para outros fins com o seu consentimento.
A Apple usa seus dados pessoais somente quando tem uma base legal válida para fazer isso.
Dependendo da circunstância, a Apple poderá confiar no seu consentimento ou no fato de que o processamento é necessário para cumprir um contrato com você, proteger seus interesses vitais ou os de outras pessoas ou seguir a legislação aplicável. Também podemos processar seus dados pessoais quando acreditarmos que seja do nosso interesse ou dos interesses legítimos de terceiros, levando em consideração seus interesses, direitos e expectativas. Mais informações estão disponíveis nas informações específicas do produto incorporadas em nossos produtos e recursos, conforme descrito acima. Se você tiver dúvidas sobre a base legal, entre em contato com a Diretoria de Proteção de Dados em
apple.com/legal/privacy/contact
.
Viabilização dos Nossos Serviços.
A Apple coleta os dados pessoais necessários para viabilizar os serviços, o que pode incluir dados pessoais coletados para personalizar ou melhorar nossas ofertas, para fins internos, como auditoria ou análise de dados, ou para solução de problemas. Por exemplo, se você quiser acessar uma música por meio de uma assinatura do Apple Music, coletamos dados sobre quais músicas você reproduz para fornecer o conteúdo solicitado e para fins de royalties.
Processamento das Suas Transações.
Para processar transações, a Apple deve coletar dados como seu nome, compra e informações de pagamento.
Comunicação com Você.
Para responder às comunicações, entrar em contato com você para tratar das suas transações ou conta, comercializar nossos produtos e serviços, fornecer outras informações relevantes ou solicitar informações ou comentários. Podemos usar seus dados pessoais periodicamente para enviar avisos importantes, como comunicações sobre compras e alterações em nossos termos, condições e políticas. Como essas informações são importantes para a sua interação com a Apple, você não pode optar por não receber tais avisos.
Segurança e Prevenção de Fraude.
Para proteger as pessoas, os funcionários e a Apple, prevenir perdas e evitar fraudes, incluindo proteger as pessoas, os funcionários e a Apple em benefício de todos os nossos usuários, bem como filtrar ou buscar conteúdo carregado possivelmente ilegal, incluindo material de exploração sexual infantil.
Dados Pessoais Usados para Personalização.
Se você optar por personalizar seus serviços ou comunicações onde tais opções estiverem disponíveis, a Apple usará as informações coletadas para oferecer a você esses serviços ou comunicações personalizadas. Você pode saber mais sobre como os serviços relevantes usam informações para personalizar sua experiência ao consultar as informações de privacidade apresentadas quando você usa um serviço que solicita o uso de seus dados pessoais pela primeira vez. Facilitamos a localização dessas informações com o ícone de Dados e privacidade, que sempre fica disponível em seu aparelho Apple e online em
apple.com/br/legal/privacy/data
.
Conformidade com a Lei.
Para fins de conformidade com a lei aplicável. Por exemplo, para atender às obrigações fiscais ou de relatório, ou para cumprir uma solicitação governamental legal.
A Apple não usa algoritmos ou perfis para tomar qualquer decisão que possa afetar você significativamente sem a oportunidade de análise humana. Além disso, a Apple não usa nem divulga dados pessoais confidenciais para quaisquer fins que exijam que um usuário exerça o direito de limitar o processamento de acordo com a lei da Califórnia.
A Apple retém dados pessoais apenas durante o tempo necessário para cumprir os objetivos para os quais foram coletados, incluindo conforme descrito nesta Política de Privacidade ou em nossos avisos de privacidade específicos de serviços, ou conforme exigido por lei. Manteremos seus dados pessoais pelo período necessário para cumprir as finalidades descritas nesta Política de Privacidade e em nossos avisos de privacidade específicos para os serviços. Ao avaliar os períodos de retenção, primeiro examinamos com atenção se é necessário reter os dados pessoais coletados e, se a retenção for necessária, nos esforçaremos para reter os dados pessoais pelo menor tempo possível permitido por lei.
A Apple pode compartilhar dados pessoais com
empresas afiliadas da Apple
,
prestadores de serviço
que agem em nosso nome, nossos
parceiros
,
desenvolvedores e editores
ou outras pessoas
de acordo com suas orientações
. Além disso, a Apple não compartilha dados pessoais com terceiros para seus propósitos de marketing.
Prestadores de Serviços.
A Apple pode contratar terceiros para atuar como nossos prestadores de serviços e executar certas tarefas em nosso nome, como processar ou armazenar dados, incluindo dados pessoais relacionados ao seu uso de nossos serviços e a entrega de produtos aos clientes. Os prestadores de serviços da Apple devem processar os dados pessoais de acordo com esta Política de Privacidade e de acordo com as nossas instruções. Eles não podem usar os dados pessoais que compartilhamos para seus próprios fins e devem excluir ou devolver os dados pessoais depois de atenderem à nossa solicitação.
Parceiros.
Às vezes, a Apple pode estabelecer parceria com terceiros para fornecer serviços ou outras ofertas. Por exemplo, as ofertas financeiras da Apple, como o Apple Card e o Apple Cash, são oferecidas pela Apple e por nossos parceiros. A Apple exige que os parceiros protejam seus dados pessoais.
Desenvolvedores e Editores de Quem Você Obtém uma Assinatura.
Se você comprar uma assinatura de terceiros na App Store ou no Apple News, criaremos um ID de Assinante exclusivo para você e para o desenvolvedor ou editor. O ID de Assinante poderá ser usado para disponibilizar relatórios ao desenvolvedor ou editor com informações sobre a assinatura adquirida e seu país de residência. Se você cancelar todas as suas assinaturas de um desenvolvedor ou editor específico, o ID de Assinante será redefinido após 180 dias caso você não faça uma nova assinatura. Essas informações são fornecidas aos desenvolvedores ou editores para que eles entendam o desempenho das assinaturas.
Outros.
A Apple pode compartilhar dados pessoais com outras pessoas de acordo com a sua orientação ou com seu consentimento, como quando compartilhamos informações com a sua operadora para ativar sua conta. Poderemos também divulgar informações sobre você se determinarmos que, para propósitos de segurança nacional, imposição da lei ou outros problemas de importância pública, a divulgação será necessária ou pertinente. Também podemos divulgar informações sobre você quando houver uma base legal para tal ação, se determinarmos que a divulgação é razoavelmente necessária para fazer cumprir nossos termos e condições ou para proteger nossas operações ou usuários ou no caso de reorganização, fusão ou venda.
A Apple não vende os seus dados pessoais, incluindo conforme a definição de “venda” em Nevada e na Califórnia. A Apple também não “compartilha” os seus dados pessoais conforme a definição desse termo na Califórnia.
Na Apple, acreditamos que a base da privacidade é uma segurança sólida. Usamos
medidas de segurança administrativas, técnicas e físicas
para proteger seus dados pessoais, considerando a natureza dos dados pessoais e o processamento, assim como as ameaças que surgirem. Trabalhamos constantemente para melhorar essas medidas de segurança para ajudar a manter os seus dados pessoais protegidos. Para obter mais informações, acesse o nosso guia
Segurança da Plataforma Apple
.
A Apple entende a importância de proteger os dados pessoais de crianças. Para a empresa, crianças são
pessoas com menos de 13 anos ou a idade equivalente conforme especificado por lei na sua jurisdição
. É por isso que a Apple implementou mais processos e proteções para ajudar a manter os dados pessoais das crianças protegidos.
Para acessar certos serviços da Apple, a criança deverá ter um Conta Apple de criança. Uma Conta Apple de criança pode ser criada por um dos
pais ou responsáveis
ou, no caso de uma Conta Apple Gerenciada, pela
instituição de ensino da criança
.
Pais e responsáveis.
Para criar uma conta de criança, os pais e responsáveis devem consultar o
Aviso de Privacidade Familiar para Crianças
, que descreve como a Apple processa os dados pessoais de crianças. Se concordarem, os pais e responsáveis deverão fornecer um consentimento parental verificável à Apple.
Instituições de Ensino.
As instituições de ensino que participam do Programa Apple School Manager também podem criar IDs Apple para os estudantes, chamados de “IDs Apple Gerenciados”. Essas instituições de ensino são obrigadas a concordar com o
Aviso de IDs Apple Gerenciados para Estudantes
incluído com o Anexo A do Contrato do Apple School Manager.
Se soubermos que os dados pessoais de uma criança foram coletados sem a autorização apropriada, eles serão excluídos o mais rápido possível.
Para exercer os direitos de privacidade das informações do seu filho, acesse a página Dados e privacidade da Apple em
privacy.apple.com/br
e inicie sessão na conta do seu filho.
Os sites, os serviços online, os apps interativos e os anúncios da Apple podem usar
“cookies” e outras tecnologias
, como web beacons.
Essas tecnologias nos ajudam a entender melhor o comportamento dos usuários, inclusive para fins de segurança e prevenção de fraudes, e nos informam quais seções dos nossos sites as pessoas visitaram, além de avaliar e contribuir para a eficácia das propagandas e buscas na Internet.
Cookies de Comunicações.
Esses cookies são usados para permitir o tráfego de rede dos sistemas da Apple e para esses sistemas, inclusive nos ajudando a detectar erros.
Cookies Extremamente Necessários.
Esses cookies são definidos conforme o necessário para disponibilizar um recurso ou serviço específico que você acessou ou solicitou. Por exemplo, eles possibilitam exibir nossos sites no formato e idioma corretos, autenticar e verificar suas transações e preservar o conteúdo de sua Sacola ao fazer compras online no site
apple.com.br
.
Outros Cookies.
Esses cookies são usados para entender como os visitantes interagem com os nossos sites e serviços online e nos ajudam a avaliar a eficácia das propagandas e buscas na Internet. A Apple também usa esses cookies para lembrar as escolhas que você faz enquanto navega para fornecer uma experiência personalizada.
Se você preferir que a Apple não use cookies, forneceremos os meios para desativar o uso deles. Para desativar os cookies no navegador Safari, selecione a opção “Bloquear todos os cookies” nos ajustes de privacidade do Safari. Se você estiver usando outro navegador, consulte seu provedor para descobrir como desativar os cookies. Talvez alguns recursos do site da Apple não fiquem disponíveis se todos os cookies estiverem desativados.
Além dos cookies, a Apple usa outras tecnologias que nos ajudam a atingir objetivos parecidos.
Em algumas mensagens de e-mail que a Apple envia para você, fornecemos um “URL clicável” que direciona você ao conteúdo do site da Apple. Quando você clica em um desses URLs, eles passam por um servidor separado antes de chegar à página de destino em nosso site. Rastreamos esse clique para nos ajudar a determinar o interesse em tópicos específicos e avaliar a eficiência de nossas comunicações com você. Para evitar o rastreamento dessa maneira, não clique nos links de texto ou elemento gráfico nas mensagens de e-mail.
A Apple geralmente processa os dados coletados usando esses cookies e tecnologias semelhantes como informações não pessoais.
Entretanto, se os endereços do Protocolo da Internet (IP) ou identificadores similares forem considerados dados pessoais pelas leis locais, também processaremos tais identificadores como dados pessoais nessas regiões. Além disso, às vezes a Apple combina dados não pessoais coletados por meio dessas tecnologias com outros dados pessoais que a Apple mantém. Ao combinarmos os dados dessa forma, tratamos os dados combinados como dados pessoais para os fins desta Política de Privacidade.
Os anúncios veiculados pela plataforma de publicidade da Apple podem aparecer na App Store, Apple News, Bolsa e app Apple TV, dependendo da sua localização. A plataforma de publicidade da Apple não rastreia você, o que significa que ela não vincula os dados de usuário ou do aparelho coletados de nossos apps aos dados de usuário ou do aparelho coletados de terceiros para publicidade direcionada ou propósitos de medição de publicidade, e não compartilha os dados de usuário ou do aparelho com corretores de dados.
Caso não queira receber anúncios da plataforma de publicidade da Apple direcionados aos seus interesses nesses apps, você pode desativar os Anúncios Personalizados. Com isso, sua Conta Apple não receberá mais esses anúncios, seja qual for o aparelho que você estiver usando. Para desativar os Anúncios Personalizados em um aparelho com iOS, iPadOS ou visionOS acesse Ajustes > Privacidade e Segurança > Publicidade da Apple e toque para desativar os Anúncios Personalizados. Para desativar os Anúncios Personalizados em um Mac, acesse Ajustes do Sistema > Privacidade e Segurança > Privacidade > Publicidade e desmarque a opção Anúncios Personalizados. Você ainda poderá ver anúncios na App Store, no Apple News ou no app Bolsa baseados no contexto, como seu histórico de busca ou o canal que estiver lendo. Se você desativar a opção Permitir que Apps Solicitem Rastreamento, os apps de terceiros não poderão solicitar o uso do Identificador de Publicidade, um identificador não pessoal do sistema operacional do seu aparelho, para rastreá-lo em apps e sites de propriedade de outras empresas.
Para obter mais informações sobre publicidade e privacidade veiculadas pela Apple, acesse
apple.com/br/legal/privacy/data/pt-br/apple-advertising
.
As ofertas e produtos Apple conectam você com o mundo. Para isso,
seus dados pessoais podem ser transferidos ou acessados por entidades ao redor do mundo,
incluindo empresas afiliadas à Apple, para realizar atividades de processamento como as descritas nesta Política de Privacidade em relação ao seu uso de nossos produtos e serviços. A Apple segue as leis sobre a transferência de dados pessoais entre países para garantir que os seus dados fiquem protegidos, onde quer que estejam.
A entidade Apple que controla seus dados pessoais pode ser diferente dependendo da sua região.
Por exemplo, as informações sobre as Apple Stores são controladas por entidades de varejo individuais em cada país, e os dados pessoais relacionados aos Serviços de Mídia da Apple podem ser controlados por várias entidades da Apple, conforme descrito nos termos de serviço. Se você não mora nos EUA, seus dados pessoais podem ser processados pela Apple Inc. e outras empresas afiliadas da Apple em nome da entidade Apple que controla os dados pessoais em sua jurisdição. Por exemplo, imagens e dados associados coletados pela Apple no mundo todo para melhorar o app Mapas da Apple e fornecer o recurso Olhe ao Redor são transferidos para a Apple Inc. na Califórnia.
Os dados pessoais relacionados a pessoas no Espaço Econômico Europeu, no Reino Unido e na Suíça são controlados pela Apple Distribution International Limited, na Irlanda. A transferência internacional que a Apple faz de dados pessoais coletados no Espaço Econômico Europeu, no Reino Unido e na Suíça é regida pelas
Cláusulas Contratuais Padrão
. Se você tiver dúvidas ou quiser uma cópia das Cláusulas Contratuais Padrão da Apple, entre em contato conosco em
apple.com/legal/privacy/contact
.
Os dados pessoais coletados pela
Apple ou uma empresa afiliada à Apple
em todo o mundo são geralmente armazenados pela Apple Inc. nos Estados Unidos. Independentemente de onde seus dados pessoais estejam armazenados, a Apple mantém o mesmo alto nível de preservação e medidas de proteção.
As práticas de privacidade da Apple, conforme descritas nesta Política de Privacidade, estão em conformidade com o Sistema Global de Normas de Privacidade Internacionais (CBPRs) e o Sistema Global de Reconhecimento de Privacidade para Processadores (PRP). Para obter mais informações sobre os sistemas globais de CBPR e PRP, acesse o
Fórum Global de CBPR
. Para conferir nossas certificações, acesse o
Diretório de Conformidade do Sistema de CBPR
. Para obter mais informações sobre o escopo de nossa participação ou enviar uma solicitação de consulta relacionada à privacidade por meio dos
Programas BBB Nacionais
, nosso Agente de Responsabilidade, acesse:
Programa de Normas de Privacidade Internacionais
Programa de Reconhecimento de Privacidade para Processadores
Os dados pessoais relacionados a pessoas na República Popular da China podem ser processados pela Apple em países fora da República Popular da China, como a Apple Inc. nos Estados Unidos ou a Apple Distribution International Limited na República da Irlanda. Quando isso ocorre, o processamento é feito em conformidade com a legislação local, incluindo a Lei de Proteção às Informações Pessoais. Para os fins de processamento estabelecidos nesta Política de Privacidade, a Apple também pode transferir esses dados pessoais para provedores de serviços terceirizados, que podem, por sua vez, armazenar ou transferir os dados para fora da República Popular da China. Para obter mais informações, acesse
Avisos de Privacidade da China Continental
.
Para garantir que os seus dados pessoais estejam seguros, comunicamos nossas diretrizes de privacidade e segurança aos funcionários da Apple e impomos estritamente as medidas de privacidade na empresa.
Se você tiver dúvidas sobre a Política de Privacidade da Apple ou as práticas de privacidade, incluindo onde um provedor de serviços terceirizado está agindo em nosso nome, ou caso queira entrar em contato com a Diretoria de Proteção de Dados, entre em contato conosco pelo site
apple.com/legal/privacy/contact
ou ligue para o
Número de Suporte da Apple
de seu país ou região.
Você também pode nos fazer perguntas sobre como enviar uma reclamação sobre privacidade, e nos esforçaremos para ajudar.
A Apple leva muito a sério suas dúvidas sobre privacidade. Uma equipe exclusiva analisa sua consulta para verificar a melhor forma de responder à sua pergunta ou preocupação, incluindo as perguntas recebidas em resposta a uma solicitação de acesso ou download. Na maioria dos casos, todos os contatos substanciais recebem uma resposta dentro de sete dias. Em alguns casos, podemos solicitar mais informações ou avisar que uma resposta exigirá mais tempo.
Se a sua reclamação indicar que uma melhoria pode ser feita na maneira como lidamos com problemas de privacidade, tomaremos medidas para fazer essa alteração na próxima oportunidade razoável. Caso um problema de privacidade tenha resultado em um impacto negativo em você ou em outra pessoa, tomaremos medidas para resolver isso com você ou com essa outra pessoa.
A qualquer momento, inclusive se não estiver satisfeito com a resposta da Apple, você pode encaminhar sua reclamação ao regulador aplicável. Se você solicitar, nós nos esforçaremos para fornecer as informações sobre as opções de reclamação que podem ser aplicáveis a suas circunstâncias.
Quando houver uma alteração importante nesta Política de Privacidade, publicaremos um aviso neste site pelo menos uma semana antes de fazer isso e entraremos em contato diretamente com você sobre a alteração se tivermos seus dados registrados.
Confira nosso certificado CBPR
Confira nosso certificado PRP
Sub-policy 2
https://unity3d.com/legal/privacypolicy:
Not found / 404
This page is no longer available.
You might find the page you are looking for by browsing through the links in our top menu.
Sub-policy 3
https://dashboard.photonengine.com/enUS/account/privacyandcookiepolicy:
Please enable Javascript to continue.
Skip to main content ...
PRODUCTS
Samples
SDKs
Documentation
Sign In
PRODUCTS
FUSION
QUANTUM
REALTIME
Classic:
PUN
CHAT
VOICE
GAMING
INDUSTRIES
Samples
SDKs
DOCUMENTATION
Dashboard
Status
Fusion
Quantum
Realtime
Classic:
PUN
Voice
Chat
Gaming
CIRCLE
Implement your games faster
with our pro tools.
Industries
CIRCLE
NON-GAMING
Benefit from the complete suite of Photon business products including Photon Server.
×
Sorry, but the page you were trying to get to does not exist.
You may have just mistyped the address or surfed an out-of-date link.
Try browsing our
homepage
to find what you were looking for.
Cookies,
anyone?
We use cookies and related technologies to enhance your experience, show you personalised content and
                analyze performance and traffic on our website.
                By clicking on the „Accept All“ button you consent to the use of non-functional cookies and the subsequent
                processing of personal data to optimize our website and services as described in more detail in our
Privacy and Cookie Policy
.
By clicking on the „Customize or Deny all“ button you can decide otherwise.
                Clicking on the „Customize“ button will take you to a page where you can configure the usage of non-functional
                cookies (and related technologies) or deny all of them. You can access these settings at any time and also
                subsequently deselect cookies at any time in the footer area of our website.
CUSTOMIZE
OR DENY ALL
ACCEPT
ALL
Cookie
Overview
We use the following categories of cookies and related technologies to enhance your experience,
                show you personalized content, and analyze performance and traffic on our website.
                We respect your right to privacy and accordingly you can chose to not allow some types of cookies (and related technologies).
                Click on the different category sliders and change our default settings to manage your cookie settings.
For more information on the specific cookies/related technologies we use and on how we use these,
                please see section 15 E. of our
Privacy and Cookie Policy
.
ACCEPT
ALL
ABSOLUTELY NECESSARY
Authentication cookies we use are required to run our services … Cookies are required:
Privacy and Cookie Policy
REQUIRED
OFF
FUNCTIONAL AND MARKETING COOKIES
These cookies collect anonymous data and allow us to optimize our
                        website and user experience. These cookies are listed here:
Privacy and Cookie Policy
ANALYTICS / TAG MANAGER
Help us to understand how visitors interact with our services, enables us
                        to analyze and improve our services (also through third party analytics).
ON
OFF
DENY
ALL
CONTINUE
WITH SELECTION